title,selftext,subreddit
Anyone down for some fortnite STW? Help me grind or I’ll help you level up,,gaygeek
"Looking for a queer friendly DM in Columbus, OH","Hey /r/gaygeeks.  Apologies up fron if this is bad form.  

Some friends and I are looking for DM for a 5e game in Columbus, OH.  A couple of us have tried but we just don't have the time and/or energy to do it.  

The group is men &amp; women, cis &amp; trans so we want someone who will run an inclusive campaign.  (Thus I'm here.)  I think I could get everyone to pony up some cash too, as I know first hand how much work it is.  ",gaygeek
Info about a ~paid~ relationship + sexual health study for male couples! :),"Hello! My name is Arielle and I'm a queer researcher and relationship skills coach at Northwestern University. I want to give you guys some info about 2GETHER, a project we have going on for male couples.

2GETHER is a paid research study that involves a relationship education program-- where you and your partner can learn skills to strengthen your relationship, like improving your communication, sexual health and satisfaction. We have a national online program and an in-person program for people who live in Chicago.

There will be follow-up surveys and free at-home STI testing before and after the 2GETHER program. Because we're a university, all data we collect is protected by IRB and federal regulations. If you and your partner are eligible, you'll get to read over a consent form, which has more information about your privacy rights.

And obviously we're going to pay you for your time-- specifically $250 each for completing all parts of the study!

Want to find out if you qualify, or learn more? Check out our eligibility screener: [https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY](https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY)

Even more info on our website: [http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/](http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/)

IRB #STU00202802, STU00202939",gaygeek
Any x-men fans out there? (Sry for dirty mirror) These storm socks are my favorite!,,gaygeek
This goose is Haru from Free,,gaygeek
"My mind never went there as a child, but makes sense...",,gaygeek
[Academic] Survey Exploring the Impact of Discrimination Against Atheists,"  

Hello,

My name is Jacob Miranda. I am a psychology graduate student at Angelo State University, San Angelo, TX. I am posting in regards to a request I would like to make. To date, there is very little research about atheists, with one study documenting only 100 articles within a span of 10 years. Most of these studies were focused on outsiders’ perceptions of atheists. In addition, out of those 100, only one incorporated the intersection between sexual orientation and atheism.

I would like to survey atheists on their experiences with discrimination and investigate if those experiences impact well-being. Below is a link to an online survey, with an informed consent for that has more information about this study. This is on a strictly voluntary basis. No personal contact information will be collected (names, addresses, e-mail, IP Address).

The only requirements we have is those who participate **must be:**

**A) 18 years or older**

**B) Self-identify as an atheist**

Please use the below link to access the survey’s consent form. The consent form provides a description of the nature of the study, as well as information about your confidentiality. 

The survey **takes about 15 minutes** to complete.

[https://angelo.az1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV\_1LgLMxqfSMxyIoR](https://angelo.az1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_1LgLMxqfSMxyIoR)

I would also be happy to answer any questions/comments that you may have here or through my email at [jmiranda2@angelo.edu](mailto:jmiranda2@angelo.edu)

Thank you for taking the time to read this post!

\-Jacob",gaygeek
Splatoon 2 Gaymers???,"Add me please?
SW-0612-5771-4520

Redirect me to the proper sub if there is one!",gaygeek
Tokyo Wants to End LGBT Discrimination by 2020 Olympics,,gaygeek
Bought the Game because the Character was Hot,"Who has ever bought a game because the character(s) is/are hot?And who? I know I cannot be the only out there who has bought a game solely on the decision that the protagonist looked hot. For me it was the entire Devil May Cry series, and it was Dante, of course. Devil May Cry? More like Devil Makes Me Thirsty. Haha  ;) ",gaygeek
LGBT+ Video Game Characters 🏳️‍🌈🌈,https://youtu.be/Xo6kTjZvFT8,gaygeek
Hello Buddies! Anyone in New Jersey?,"anyone around?

&amp;#x200B;

lonely...",gaygeek
Why does this Pokemon Trainer look like he should be a go-go dancer?,,gaygeek
What are friends mean to you?,Check out @alvinfoo’s Tweet: https://twitter.com/alvinfoo/status/1033025418025005057?s=09,gaygeek
Gender-bending Lara Croft cosplay,,gaygeek
Anyone else??,"So, I identify as a gay male and I have since I was 13. About a year or two ago, I came across some female cartoonish type erotica and realized I actually quite enjoyed it. Ever since, I’ve slowly discovered more and more before moving on to actual straight porn with human females. 

I still obviously consider myself as gay, but can any of the other gay guys on here relate to liking things or having certain interests that don’t 100% align with the orientation you define yourself as?",gaygeek
Our new Gay Youtube Series - Just uploaded our first episode! Plz check it out and comment! 😜👊,,gaygeek
Magic the Gathering-Melbourne,"Wife and I are *newish* to the area (Ringwood), looking to find guys or girls to hang with and play some MTG. Doesn't just have to be Magic, 
A bit of Mario Kart goes a long way. This would be a good opportunity  for other people to meet new friends. Happy Days!",gaygeek
UK Gaymers Discord Server,,gaygeek
Wanna play to Fornite?,,gaygeek
Under 30 and living with HIV? [Sexual Health],"Are you an HIV-positive young person (under 30 y/o) who is taking medication for HIV? Are you having trouble taking your HIV medications? The Positive STEPS research team at Ann &amp; Robert H. Lurie Children’s Hospital of Chicago is interested in learning how to find ways to help young folks take their HIV medications! If eligible, we'll invite you to our research office in Uptown Chicago for a visit. Participants can earn up to $310. 

To  learn more and to see if you're eligible calling us at 872.228.9051!

More information about the study can be found on our website: www.luriechildrens.org/positivesteps

Approved by the Brown University IRB # 1605001507 (PIs: M. Mimiaga/R. Garofalo)",gaygeek
Picard Returning for Star Trek on CBS All-Access,[Picard Returning for Star Trek on CBS All-Access](https://deadline.com/2018/08/patrick-stewart-star-new-star-trek-series-jean-luc-picard-cbs-all-access-1202440156/),gaygeek
What is your favorite Marvel merch?,,gaygeek
World of Warcraft - LGBT+ Guild (EU Horde),"**The  Admiral Duncan is the WoW guild of the London Gaymers, based on the  Draenor (EU) server playing on the Horde side. It was formed in 2016 and  is one of the largest European LGBT+ guilds in the game, but thankfully  with the new World of Warcraft Expansion we can now have a community no  matter what realm you are on.**

We  have members from all over the United Kingdom as well as from Western  Europe. We want to ensure London Gaymers has inclusive IRL spaces as  well as online communities to help foster relationships with people from  outside London, with the WoW guild forming a key part of that.

As  a part of London Gaymers it’s important that we continue to embody and  support the values that LG uphold. To enable this we don’t have a  requirement to join the guild as we see ourselves as a safe community  and home for WoW players from all walks of life. As well as the online  events and raids we run, we organise events for players to come together  and enjoy their time in game. The majority of our events are “open”  which means anyone who wants to come along, can come along, as the aim  of the guild is to foster a safe place for people to enjoy a game that  we all love!

With the next Battle For Azeroth Expansion, we are also ensuring that LGBT+ people who are in  other guilds and other EU Realms (and playing Horde) can join in to our  events by joining our community and using this to find new Dungeon, Raid  and Questing partners from all other EU realms.

Admiral Duncan EU Horde Community Web Link: [https://worldofwarcraft.com/en-us/invite/p9OoGlIN3A?region=EU&amp;faction=Horde](https://worldofwarcraft.com/en-us/invite/p9OoGlIN3A?region=EU&amp;faction=Horde)

In Game Copy and Paste Community Link - p9OoGlIN3A

Discord : [http://discord.londongaymers.co.uk](http://discord.londongaymers.co.uk/)",gaygeek
I AM GROOT (translation: Just another Friday night),,gaygeek
Do people read the titles?,I love anime my favorite is fairy tail I like some super hero stuff and wwe just message me and let's talk about something random ,gaygeek
Gay WoW Horde Community!,"Hey y'all! If you're a WoW gamer and on the horde side! Come join our LGBT community in-game!

https://www.worldofwarcraft.com/invite/ee7OGgFvmN?region=US&amp;faction=Horde

Look forward to making new friends &lt;3 ",gaygeek
Help us test an HIV prevention app!,"The MyPEEPS Mobile study is looking for young guys who are into other guys, between the ages of 13 to 18, to help us test a mobile HIV prevention app. Eligible individuals will complete surveys and be given the app to use. Participants will be compensated for their time (up to $275).

MyPEEPS Mobile is a nation-wide research study at Birmingham (Alabama), Chicago (Illinois), New York City, and Seattle (Washington). 

To find out if you are eligible, please go to:

[https://redcap.sac-cu.org/surveys/index.php?s=K3RJACWLYM](https://redcap.sac-cu.org/surveys/index.php?s=K3RJACWLYM) 

More information about the study can be found on our website: [https://www.mypeepsmobile.org/](https://www.mypeepsmobile.org/) 

Partner institutions include: Columbia University, Ann &amp; Robert H. Lurie Children's Hospital of Chicago, University of Washington, and University of Alabama at Birmingham. 

Approved by the Columbia University IRB (PI: R. Schnall, # IRB-AAAQ6500).",gaygeek
In love with marvel merchandise💙,,gaygeek
Single attractive bottom guy here in the Washington DC area. If interested hit me up.,,gaygeek
Book 2 of my queer historic detective series has begun updating.,,gaygeek
Iceman is coming back!!!!,I absolutely loved the last Iceman comic and was super bummed out when it was cancelled... but it's coming back! September 12th!!,gaygeek
22 [bi] dont have many gay friends,"idk if this is the right subreddit for this but I'm just really looking for gay, bi, lgbt friends. uhm a little about me hm: i play games, read comics, architecture major and I'm awkward and shy. if this appeals to you somehow, maybe hmu?",gaygeek
LGBTQ+ Cancer Screening Survey (Anonymous)," Hi everyone

I'm a medical student working in the Radiation Oncology department at Thomas Jefferson University in Philadelphia. Our team, led by Dr. Nicole Simone, is fighting to reduce barriers to quality health care outcomes in the LGBTQ\+ community.

**At the moment, we're interested in investigating how barriers such as cost and stigmatization may cause patients to forgo or delay vital health care treatments or cancer screening guidelines.** In short, we want to better understand how equitable, fair results can be best obtained for those in the LGBTQ\+ community.

\-\-\-

If you have a bit of time, we'd love for you to fill out the attached short survey!

[https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW](https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW)

**The survey is entirely confidential** and there is no identifiable material included in it.

\-\-\-

Thank you!",gaygeek
18 M Florida looking for regular chat buddy!,"I’m pretty lonely as I’m new to Florida and don’t really know anyone around here. I’m looking for a guy to get chatting to over time about anything and everything, age isn’t an issue for me, in fact I kind of like the idea of having an older online buddy who I can share stuff with. Obviously I’m a pretty geeky guy into video games and anything comic book related. Drop me a PM if you are interested and we can take things from there 🙂",gaygeek
Does Linus Sebastian (from Linus Tech Tips) set your gaydar off?,"I mean I know he's married, and I know he's almost certainly not gay \(maybe bi?\), but IMO he looks twinky as fuck and has an adorable femme\-kinda accent \(that's coming from a Brit here\). So yeah...",gaygeek
Does anyone else spend a lot of time thinking about all the gay subtext in Harry Potter?,,gaygeek
"Not sure if this is the place to post this but hey guys 👋 I’m new to this, looking for some friends to game with etc. Say hi 😃",,gaygeek
LGBT comics suggestions?,Any recommendations for good series featuring gay characters? I'm usually into sci-fi or superheroes but I'm open to anything...,gaygeek
Any guys here looking for a good bottom boyfriend?,,gaygeek
"Fun YouTube channel for gay geeks, gaymers, and more!","My roomie and I run a channel with our job that caters to the LGBTQ lifestyle.  We've got celebrity interviews, Gaymer videos, and more.  We just finished a great series with The Gay Comic Book Geek about the Marvel Cinematic Universe and the Infinity War.  Just search for #PlayNapoleon on YouTube!

Let me know what you guys think as well, and we can make more videos with the content you guys want.",gaygeek
Has anyone seen the new Lost in Space series? If so is it worth a watch?,,gaygeek
Spider-Man Loves Batman Enamel Pin,,gaygeek
Can I give some feedback to Star Trek Discovery?,"HI 

Also Spoilers!!!!!!

TL;DR
pls stop killing queers as plot points/ character development 

Just wanna say I LOVE this show. I loved all the Star Trek shows because of the story-driven narrative, great characters (with the exception of an unnamed Talaxian) and progressive attitude.

The one thing I was saddened by was the death of Dr. Hugh Culber. As a geeky little gay boy, I was desperate as a child for any representation in my sci-fi of queer characters. Scifi was my way of imagining a future where gay people were equal and treated fairly and it was something in was rarely able to find. My heart nearly exploded when the series revealed the Dr. Culber was in a committed relationship with LT. Stamets. FINALLY GAYS IN SPACE.
I allowed my self to get really invested in that relationship even though it was sidelined for more heteronormative relationships storylines (which is fine, the showrunner relationship deserves more attention), and also traditionally queer relationships often end horribly in television and cinema RE: Bury Your Gays Trope. But i was sure that such a progressive socially aware show wouldent fall into boring typicall tv tropes....... and then..... sigh.

So I'm so incredibly sad that once again there is no happy ending for the only queer characters so far. I'm sad that such an overused trope was used to tug my heartstrings. BUT I get it, queer people have to die in media sometime, it's ridiculous to say "" NO GAYS CAN EVER DIE IN MEDIA!"" 

What is really killing me the most is the underwhelming reaction the other characters have to Culbers death. No one seems to care! More attention is given to Michael and Ash's relationship troubles which pale in comparison to Lt Stamets losing his LIFE PARTNER to MURDER. I found it hard to care about their couple month long relationship coming to an end when Paul loses the love of his life.

So if I could feedback to the writers I would like to identify the behaviour of killing queer characters and not giving the death the proper emotional weight as other characters deaths/ relationships. The impact this behavior has on the queer community is that it makes us feel that even our most traumatic/ painful experiences aren't equal to straight people relationship problems. it makes us feel like our lives are dispensable as long as it carries forward the plot of straight characters.


well that my rant",gaygeek
RHYS PLAYS - Pokemon FireRed - 001: Reba Loves Abusing Animals,,gaygeek
Any recommendations on good gay themed video games?,,gaygeek
LGBTQ+ Research Participants Needed,"Hello all! I really need LGBT+ participants who are in a relationship for my research on the factors that influence relationship satisfaction. Straight participants will also be appreciated but, as the research in this field is lacking, I'm particularly interested in finding out what makes people in LGBT+ relationships happy. Please participate if you can. I would really really appreciate it  :)

https://aruspsych.eu.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_6JPEXlUSBSMsdMx",gaygeek
Did anyone get anything good for Valentines Day? I got a chess board :),,gaygeek
My new online LGBT comic series about a hot guy looking for love in a big city.,,gaygeek
This is my life...D&amp;D&amp;DP?,,gaygeek
"[Survey] Participants needed for Study Investigating how Self-Compassion can help reduce Suicidal Ideation &amp; Behaviours among Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual Adults 18years+. Click the link for further information and to complete the survey. Thank you in advance for your response and interest in the study!",,gaygeek
[Have YOUR voice heard in research] Seeking PARTICIPANTS for an ONLINE STUDY on the experience of ANAL PAIN during sexual activity. [All sexual orientations and gender identities welcome!],"Seeking participants who experience anal pain upon receptive anal penetration. Participants must be able to read and write in English and be over the age of 18. Completion of online questionnaires to assess the experience of anal pain, relationship factors, and sexual functioning and satisfaction will take approximately 20 to 30 minutes. To participate please click on the link below. For more information about this study, contact the Sex Lab by telephone (613) 533-3276 or email sex.lab@queensu.ca. All inquiries are completely confidential.  
https://queensu.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_aWQkBCwCAgoDws5
",gaygeek
Handsome Math Professor Pietro Boselli Explains Fermat's Last Theorem | GQ,,gaygeek
"Gaybro here. Got a YouTube channel if anyone would like to watch and support my sister and I. We mainly have been doing let's play videos, but hoping to branch out to other gaming related videos as we go. Hope you like our bantering!",,gaygeek
Kinda new to this. Someone say hi! 😃,,gaygeek
Gay Geek YouTube Channel!!!!,"So I created a YouTube channel a while ago, named iSaKecHaOs if you want to check it out. Im gonna use it to talk about all my favorite things video games, movies, books, television, comics, collectibles, cosplay. All the good stuff. Let me know what you think of it and things you would like me to do or talk about on it. ",gaygeek
[Self] me in my selfmade Prompto FFXV Christmas outfit :3,,gaygeek
16 year old boy,"Hey, I'm a 16 year old boy and I would really like some people from around the same age to talk with, I'm kinda lonely.",gaygeek
Webfic about gay detectives who solve murders.,,gaygeek
Who else plays Overwatch or Dead by Daylight on Xbox? :),"Add me and let’s game!
Nocturnalwaves ",gaygeek
PS4 Gaymers!!!,Add me: ericmichael27 ,gaygeek
"Join the Battle for Net Neutrality! Net neutrality will die in a month in the US and will affect many websites and services, unless we fight for it!",,gaygeek
Tech/Web Gays?,"Anyone out there who is a good web/tech developer? I have some ideas for things I'd like to do, but don't have the experience to do it alone. Is there a more specific subreddit I should post under? I couldn't find anything else, so this made the most sense. Hope it's ok. I'm in SoCal, so someone local would be a plus. PM me. Thanks!",gaygeek
Element collecting,"I was wondering if there are any other gay geeks out there collecting the chemical elements.

Here's my story: I built a 7 foot wide wooden periodic table shadow box (with arduino-controlled lights), and started making YouTube videos about the elements I've collected. I set this up as a challenge for myself though:

Challenge #1: I'm not ordering any elements or chemicals off of the Internet.  I'm getting everything from real-world places in Portland, Oregon. (Glassware is an exception. I haven't found affordable test tubes in meat space)

Challenge #2: Samples obtained must be reasonably pure elements, not compounds. (I may make exceptions for elements that are both unreasonable to obtain in pure form, and unreasonably difficult to extract in visible quantities.)

Progress so far: I've just published my ninth episode, and put my ninth element on my table. In order of acquisition, I have:
Aluminum, Lead, Zinc, Carbon, Tin, Bismuth, Magnesium, Copper, and Silver.
I plan on adding Gallium in this weekend's episode, and Hydrogen, Chlorine, and Manganese in the coming weeks (not necessarily in that order)

Anyway, I hope it's ok to post a link to my channel, for anyone who wants to see the videos: https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCsup2khgX7Ol70qqXhRHwGQ",gaygeek
Understanding love across different types of romantic relationships Survey,,gaygeek
Website with kinkified comic characters on tees.,,gaygeek
New LGBT themed Indie Comic deals with mental illness,,gaygeek
Talk over discord?,"Hey I am a 17 year old, would love to talk to someone cuz Im bored and have few friends",gaygeek
Tea Bag Party,,gaygeek
90s making a come back. Does anyone recognise this? it looks familiar.,,gaygeek
Hey guys,What makes you a geek?,gaygeek
/r/gay /r/geek Green Arrow @ Vancouver Pride,"Hey, did anyone see Stephen Smell at Vancouver pride. I feel that its a serious step in the right direction that a superhero attended. Absolutely devastated I was not there myself :(",gaygeek
Bearded Sailor Senshis \o/,,gaygeek
Discord Server for OKCupid LGBT •X-Post r/OKCupidLGBT,,gaygeek
Looks like he joined the pink side. (Edmonton Pride 2017),,gaygeek
Any gay/bi Whovians out there?,"I have been a hardcore Whovian since my freshman year of high school (20 and in college now). Ten is my Doctor, and Donna is my companion. I am an avid Ten cosplayer, with an instagram and everything.

As a proud, openly bisexual Whovian, I want to know if there are any Whovians on here! :D Allons-y!",gaygeek
"Hi! People ages 12-20, can you take a brief survey to help us understand the experiences of young people like you? You could win a $250 Visa gift card or other prizes. Thank you, and Happy Pride!",,gaygeek
When he bottoms for the first time,,gaygeek
Hey! Please check out my new youtube video for Thatgaygeek,,gaygeek
My boyfriend programming his 24 port switch with command line for our home network. Love the geek.,,gaygeek
Exceptional Bullshit! Two genderqueerdos and Chaz play video games. Today we’re playing through Crowtel Renovations~,,gaygeek
BuzzFeed: Trying A Gender Neutral Online Personal Shopper,,gaygeek
Engineering Student Accepts Diploma In Dress And Heels,,gaygeek
Uncharted [NSFW],,gaygeek
"Dr. Neil deGrasse Tyson at Harvard, late 1970's (Hot… both literally and figuratively)",,gaygeek
Bodybuilders Try Belly Dancing For The First Time [BuzzFeed video],,gaygeek
Revelation.,This may show my messed up priorities and say a lot about me as a person but my boyfriend revealed today he hasn't seen firefly and it's the first time in our relationship that I've doubted him as person. 😵,gaygeek
Muscle Bear Dress Up Figure Kickstarter!,,gaygeek
Geek gay instagarm ( maybe NSFW),,gaygeek
Keeping it #wild with my new album on CD. http://goo.gl/ylfkD9 If this gets 100 up votes I'll post w/ the cassette 😉,,gaygeek
Jesse Wellens as the Silver Surfer by Madeyewlook,,gaygeek
Freestyle Love Supreme - Scott &amp; Abraham (improv rap),,gaygeek
Gay Mormon Super Heroes Are Knocking On Your Kickstarter Door.,,gaygeek
"Brad &amp; Price mix baseball &amp; lacrosse...and other things...in new episode of Kyle's B&amp;B, (full episode at kylecomics.com)",,gaygeek
'American Male' Short Film | Look Different | MTV,,gaygeek
I Made Gayish Themed Stickers for iMessages and Very Proud of Myself,,gaygeek
Iceman Goes To A Gay Bar In Latest Issue Of “X-Men”,,gaygeek
Blog devoted to critiquing the fashions of Star Trek TNG,,gaygeek
Scooter from the Muppets should have been gay,"Everyone seems to have an opinion about the Muppets latest attempt at prime-time tv. I'm pretty indifferent (the Muppets have been trying some pretty lame stuff for a long time now, so not much different there). But one thing I was somewhat upset about was that I was sure the were setting Scooter up to come out of the closet. Then they ended up with that dumb story arc where he's dating Chelsea Handler. I thought Scooter being gay would be such a lovely and fitting tribute to his original performer / creator (?) Richard Hunt. ",gaygeek
My 4 year anniversary of coming out. Rocking my Apple Watch with rainbow pride band.,,gaygeek
Power Up With Pride! A Multi-Streamer Charity Marathon is Taking Place This Weekend (July 22nd - 24th) to Benefit the AIDS Healthcare Foundation,"**Power Up With Pride**

Taking place this weekend on Twitch is the first ever [Power Up With Pride](http://twitch.tv/powerupwithpride) charity streamathon!

All donations go to support the [AIDS Healthcare Foundation](http://www.aidshealth.org/#/) which helps individuals suffering from AIDS and HIV by providing treatment, and shelter.  

There will be 30+ LGBT and LGBT friendly streamers donating their time to the event, and we'd really appreciate your support.  Don't forget to stop by the event's [twitter page](https://twitter.com/PwerUpWithPride) for more information, and THANKS!",gaygeek
Do you know your boyfriend? [Brazilian Portuguese],,gaygeek
Trip To Micro Center To Get New Headphones,,gaygeek
"Jontron Challenge, shirtless ref Remington Perregaux",,gaygeek
Engineering the aluminum can,,gaygeek
Check out this drag design.,,gaygeek
Chris Pratt speaks German in Interview Oscar 2015,,gaygeek
Hot Roommate (The Kids Table Comedy),,gaygeek
"handJobs (Jobs movie trailer parody, The Kids Table Comedy)",,gaygeek
Captain America: The Winter Sweetheart (thoughts on the #GiveCaptainAmericaABoyfriend movement),,gaygeek
Dark Phoenix,"As a terrible ""fan"" of X-Men and mostly just a fan of the movies, I have only recently learned much about this character (Now off to watch the old animated series and keep learning). What are you guys hoping to see accomplished in the next few movies with this character? After the terrible display in X3, do you think they will do her justice this time around?",gaygeek
Steve Carell as Fabio in 1994,,gaygeek
Rubber Crazy by Improvised Shakespeare Company,,gaygeek
"Baseball's Brett Jackson demonstrates 3D fitness tracker, ""Naked""",,gaygeek
52 LGBT Superheroes and Villains,,gaygeek
Gay comics worlds collide! It's a Legion of Super-Heroes party at Kyle's Bed &amp; Breakfast!!!,,gaygeek
New CPU Cooler For BF,,gaygeek
Goals in Google Calendar,,gaygeek
"I did a ted talk about one of my recent games, let me know what you thnk",,gaygeek
The Pride have launched a Kickstarter to do a hardcover collection of LGBTQ superheroes,,gaygeek
T-Mobile Vs Sprint,,gaygeek
Sunspot &amp; Colossus go in for a check-up and leave me drooling,,gaygeek
Building a boyfriend work rig.,"Hello i am working on building my boyfriend a good system he can use adobe premiere on to do his work.  he draws and makes youtube videos.  his current system kind of sucks but it does what he needs i want to build him a system that will be more efficient at doing so. if your part of the LTT forum i have a post there and on pc parts picker. i need your help...  if you have experience with premiere and building a good system let me know.  

his videos... https://www.youtube.com/user/uberfeeser

My PCPP Link  https://pcpartpicker.com/guide/VKG323/the-boyfriends-work-build

My Forum post LTT   https://linustechtips.com/main/topic/571254-boyfriends-work-computer/

help me please...

His current Build:

CPU: AMD FX-6300 3.5GHz 6-Core Processor 
Motherboard: Biostar A960D+ Micro ATX AM3+ Motherboard 
Memory: G.Skill Ripjaws Series 4GB (1 x 4GB) DDR3-1333 Memory
Memory: G.Skill Ripjaws Series 4GB (1 x 4GB) DDR3-1333 Memory
Storage: Kingston SSDNow V300 Series 120GB 2.5"" Solid State Drive
Storage: Western Digital Caviar Blue 1TB 3.5"" 7200RPM Internal Hard Drive
Video Card: Asus GeForce GTX 750 Ti 2GB STRIX Video Card
Power Supply: EVGA 750W 80+ Gold Certified Fully-Modular ATX Power Supply",gaygeek
HDD Change Out on my Dell Inspiron N5010,,gaygeek
"[Con] It doesn't get gaygeekier than this: the biggest gay geek convention in the world. GaymerX: Year Four, Sept 30 - Oct 2, Santa Clara.",,gaygeek
She-ra Better She-run. Drag Scorpia Came to Slay,,gaygeek
"Cute guy, clown makeup tutorial",,gaygeek
Life of a fat Cook Who Likes to Game Stream,,gaygeek
Marvel's Captain America: Civil War - Trailer 2,,gaygeek
BelAmi Models Chapstick Challenge,,gaygeek
Perpetuum Jazzile - Blame It On The Boogie (The Jackson 5 a cappella cover),,gaygeek
Shirtless in a tub of putty,,gaygeek
"Prop making, Portal's Companion Cube",,gaygeek
Lesbians in undergrad: Please consider taking this survey about how we make plans for the future!,,gaygeek
Bryan Fuller - Wikipedia - A definitely perk for the new Star Trek show runner. :),,gaygeek
"[X-post /r/comicbooks] Without context, this looks like it's going in a very different direction. [Batman: Europa #1]",,gaygeek
Does anyone have suggestions for good sci fi erotica?,"I'm trying to find some decently written gay sci fi erotica - but everything I'm finding on nifty is kind of poorly written. Any suggestions would be super appreciated. ;)

http://www.nifty.org/nifty/gay/sf-fantasy/",gaygeek
Being LGBT in Japan (Japanese Interview at Tokyo Rainbow Pride 2015),,gaygeek
Gay Fallout Valentine's Day Shirt!,,gaygeek
Men.com XXX Star Wars Parody,,gaygeek
Here's how one movie theater is prepping for the massive 'Star Wars' premiere,,gaygeek
Star Wars Early Screening Prank (No Spoilers),,gaygeek
Comicosity review of The Pride - LGBTQ superhero series,,gaygeek
Munchpak Unboxing - Sweets/Candy from around the world!,,gaygeek
Be$tie$ for Ca$h - Murray Swanby &amp; Jeffrey Hawkins,,gaygeek
Judo: Introduction for Beginners,,gaygeek
"Stan Lee On Gay Iceman ""I Don't Care What Happens, As Long As They Tell Good Stories""",,gaygeek
Don Cheadle is Captain Planet,,gaygeek
Cat Ear Headphones - I'd like one in every colour please!,,gaygeek
Pokémon Theme Jazz Cover - if this is what all jazz sounds like then I think I love jazz!,,gaygeek
"June Lockhart Says ""Lost In Space's"" Dr. Smith Was GAY! GAY! GAY!",,gaygeek
Unboxing Marvel Collector Corps Villains - anyone else into subscription box services?,,gaygeek
"Welcome to Nightvale Austin, Texas","Hey everyone, I have an extra ticket to Welcome to Nightvale at the Paramount in Austin for Saturday at 7pm. If anyone is interested in going please let me know. I'd hate for a ticket to be wasted.",gaygeek
Need a good read.,"Love sci-fi, fantasy, dystopian, etc. All time fav books include Ender's Game, Harry Potter, and pretty much anything by Neil Gaiman. 

What's yours?",gaygeek
Did someone or something just break Grindr?,"I find this truly bizarre. I logged into grindr today, just to see if I had any messages. I look once in a while. But today, every single profile I can see contains the same exact text:

""I film sex films. You may see my vids by going to my site on your puter (without quotes) 'Vids25 . c.o.m'. If you wish, you could msg me and let me know what you think of them all.""

Here's the thing, it's *every single profile*. And duplicate pictures abound.
Has Grindr been cyberattacked?",gaygeek
Oh My Gay! Buying Time is a amazing Gay webcomic,"Disclaimer I'm not the owner of this comic just a fan who just recently found this comic. 
Buying Time is a amazing cyberpunk webcomic made in flash and I love how it's done. And the art is fantastic too. 

Go read it for yourself. buyingtime.the-comic.org/comics/1/",gaygeek
Check out our critically acclaimed cyberpunk point and click adventure with queer themes and characters!,,gaygeek
Just set up our tv's in the living room so we can play destiny,,gaygeek
Daft Punk Harder Bodies (Male version) Harder Better Faster.,,gaygeek
Shirtless guy builds hut,,gaygeek
I've discovered the oddest gay ship yet... complete with resulting lovechild.,,gaygeek
Cole Mcgrath Infamous,,gaygeek
Wanna find out what that cute geek is packing? Accepting Submissions now!,,gaygeek
First attempt at free hand painting Princess Bubblegum,,gaygeek
"I love a geeky a heartthrob!!! So when I say this page of ""15 Nerdy Actors Who Grew Up To Be Heartthrobs"" I had to share!",,gaygeek
Gay Comic Book Characters Zap Stereotypes,,gaygeek
Had a nerd moment when I saw colleague's drink mix,,gaygeek
35 K-Pop Dances in 21 Minutes (K-Pop Con Miami Dance Game),,gaygeek
Do you want to help with academic research? Want to become a parent at some point in the future?,,gaygeek
Looking to chat with other geeks?,"Come to #GayGeeksUnite on kik!

We welcome all types of people and all types of geeks! 

Rules: 
1: be 18+
2: be nice!
3: nudes are allowed but read the chat first and see if it's appropriate 

#GayGeeksUnite can't wait to discuss comics, movies, TV, and more! ",gaygeek
"ThinkGeek is having a sale! AAAAAAnnnnnddd, I'm broke.",,gaygeek
Creating a Board Game.,"Hey everyone, my friends and I are big board game geeks. We play many all the time, we get together about 1-2 times a week and play. 

We have played games such as:

BSG
Alchemists
Shadows Of Brimstone
Mage Knight
Student Bodies
Pandemic
Catan
Betrayal at the House on the Hill,
Legend of Drizzt
Eldritch Horror

So on and so forth. I decided in my spare time I wanted to develop a board game. I am very creative and love the idea of creating something of my own.

The reason I am posting here is because I wanted to ask you all. What are your favorite mechanics in Board Games?

Preferably games like Shadows of Brimstone, Legends of Drizzt, games that you can play multiple times with multiple stories and missions.

I really want to make an awesome game that I can bring to not only game nights with my friends but other places around Chicago to show people and get feedback and develop it even further!

Thanks everyone!

**EDIT** 
I really wanted to make a Zombie game loosely based off Shadows of Brimstone. With the tile placement and Characters. I love that game, but I think a zombie version would be awesome because the possibilities are endless. I just want to know what kind of mechanics people have liked in the past.
Do you like D6's or do you like using more than just that? Do you Like mini's? Things of that nature.",gaygeek
Lego BF?,"Wish I had a Lego-loving boyfriend. I'm also into video games (FPS, sandbox, games with a story), literature, movies, geeky decor, and doing research/coding for my doctoral studies. 

Sound appealing?",gaygeek
Tineye and Google image search - Good for busting liars?,"Wow, I'm a bit frustrated right now. Never trust anyone on the Interwebz is the lesson I just re-learned tonight. Sorry for this rant and I'm prepared to be downvoted, but what the hell...

I was chatting all afternoon with a nice fellow on an IRC channel. He was interested in becoming a nudist, just as me. He was bisexual, just as me. He seemed like a pleasant fellow and the exhibitionist in me took over and I sent some frisky pictures that he responded that he liked.

I started to get curious how the guy I was chatting with looked like and asked very nicely if he could send me a picture. I said it hadn't have to be a nude one. And if he did not want to share a picture, I would be okay with that too.
But he complied and in return the most beautiful man showed up in a photo.

It was a bit too fucking good. The geek in me commanded me to run the picture through a simple image search.  I just had to run it trough Google Picture search and Tineye. Just. In. Case. 

And of course... It was a picture that had been plastered over the whole god damn Internet. A whole bunch of Tumblr-blogs, a Pornhub account with the picture as an avatar (were it seemed to belong to a single dude from Britain, while the guy I was chatting with was Canadian) and a bunch of other places.

I called him out and said I would be more than happy to be proved wrong. But instead he said good bye and disconnected. Busted I guess?

**TL;DR - Be careful sharing pictures on the Internet. But please don't fucking lie when people try to be nice. :(**",gaygeek
I thought you guys might appreciate this.,,gaygeek
Hold Ups Boxer Briefs: A Revolutionary Change to Underwear by George Miller and Louis Metzger,,gaygeek
A Basement Dedicated to Extreme LEGO Building,,gaygeek
What actually happens when gay guys see other gay guys and straight people aren't around,,gaygeek
My Road to Haskell [Found],,gaygeek
"Hi my name is Mimi Tachikawa, and this is my Digimon Palmon!",,gaygeek
C2E2 Weekend Costume Help.,"Hey everyone so for the first time in my life I am Cosplaying, this upcoming weekend at C2E2 in Chicago. 

My friend and I decided we are going to be Characters from two different TV shows. He is going as Pokemon and I as Digimon. We both decided to go as female characters, this will be my first time going out in public in drag. I chose Mimi, now I've watched the show and know her mannerisms, pretty well. Im only missing one thing... PALMON... 

Its almost impossible to find some kind of Palmon plush toy that I can get on such short notice that isn't over $100. I have looked everywhere. Im trying to convince a friend to put together a costume as her but Im not sure if that will happen. 

What do I do? ",gaygeek
Anyone else enjoying Daredevil?,Starting the 4th episode and already hoping for more suited like this from Netflix,gaygeek
An unpowered exoskeleton decreases the energy required for walking,,gaygeek
X-post nerdtattoo - New Tetris Themed tattoo with addition,,gaygeek
"The HavenCon Shop, Star Wars Galore and a HUGE Thank You!",,gaygeek
Meet Your HavenCon Organizer Shane,,gaygeek
We're running a HavenCon AMA all day! Click through and ask away!,,gaygeek
Collection of my Genderbent Shadowcat Cosplay! :),,gaygeek
Door Prices for HavenCon,,gaygeek
I've forgotten why I shouldn't blink!,,gaygeek
Anybody else have a connection to a character from a movie or a TV show?,,gaygeek
Looking for nerdy girlfriend (18-25),"I'm looking to connect with someone on a personal level. I'm 20 and my names Heather. I like girls and non binary folks. I love anime and manga. I like poetry, reading, and writing . Home stuck seems cool :) I'd like someone who can text all the time abd is from usa or Canada .

Kik : trinity_95

Skype : skynight_95 ",gaygeek
HavenCon Welcomes Janet Varney and Dante Basco!,,gaygeek
Online Registration for HavenCon Ends March 1st - Discounts Available,,gaygeek
Vendor Registration Is Open Again for HavenCon,,gaygeek
Pied Piper and the LGBT Inclusive Nature of The Flash and Arrow,,gaygeek
HavenCon Content and Updates,,gaygeek
Comedian D.J. Demers on Conan,,gaygeek
BuzzFeed Try Guys try shooting guns,,gaygeek
"Now Taking Reservations for the ""Hall of Arts"" at HavenCon - The First LGBTQA Geek and Gaming Convention of Texas",,gaygeek
The Imitation Game,"The Imitation Game is a historical thriller about British mathematician, logician, cryptanalyst and pioneering computer scientist Alan Turing.

Turing is one of our idols! He's like the original gay geek!

What'd you think?
",gaygeek
Vegans Try Taxidermy,,gaygeek
Tennis player Kei Nishikori in Cup Noodle commercial,,gaygeek
Is Cereal Soup?,,gaygeek
"Andrew Rannells in underwear (Girls, deleted scene)",,gaygeek
"Half-male, half-female cardinal neither sings nor has a mate",,gaygeek
F.D.A. Lifting Ban on Gay Blood Donors,,gaygeek
Legend of Korra Creators Officially Confirm Your Suspicions About That Ending,,gaygeek
BuzzFeed Try Guys try Nude Modeling with the Warwick Rowers,,gaygeek
"If I Were a Disney Princess [BuzzFeed Video, musical]",,gaygeek
Raffaello D'Andrea: The astounding athletic power of quadcopters,,gaygeek
Wonder Woman Takes a Big Step Back,,gaygeek
Dr Who Christmas special countdown! What other Christmas Specials are you counting the minutes to?,,gaygeek
Gay Tide commercial,,gaygeek
BuzzFeed Try Guys try drag,,gaygeek
The latest Sean Cody model is Filipino (NSFW),"Of particular interest are his thigh tattoos. One is adapted from the ""sun"" on the Filipino flag. The other is written in an ancient Filipino script. You generally never seen Filipino script, like ever.",gaygeek
Underwear models dance to Sia's Chandelier,,gaygeek
Top 10 Overused Gay Porn Scenarios (YouTube),,gaygeek
Loki and Tony do all kinds of bad things,,gaygeek
Happy Holidays from Colby Melvin (NSFW),,gaygeek
"Rainbow Man (Official Trailer), starring Vine's Logan Paul",,gaygeek
Star Wars: Episode VII - The Force Awakens Official Teaser Trailer #1,,gaygeek
Happy Thanksgiving!,"Happy Thanksgiving to all of you in gay geek land!

So, how will you be keeping your holiday weekend gay and geeky? Eyeing any special purchases?",gaygeek
Pentatonix - Silent Night (Live),,gaygeek
Gay rapper Big Dipper on Jonny McGovern’s Hey Qween,,gaygeek
"Cazwell feat. Big Dipper - Hot Homo [A Freestyle Parody of Bobby Shmurda's ""Hot N*gga""]",,gaygeek
How about that girlfriend?,,gaygeek
Norwegian curling champions putting their pants on,,gaygeek
American Guys Try European Swimwear,,gaygeek
*NSYNC - O Holy Night,,gaygeek
Spiders Disguise Themselves as Ants to Hide and Hunt Their Prey,,gaygeek
Chinese... chicken dance?,,gaygeek
Crossplay make-up tutorial,,gaygeek
Neil Patrick Harris and David Burtka for London Fog,,gaygeek
"Dance piece, Public Displays",,gaygeek
Telly Leung makes me feel all sorts of different feelings. Glad he made the list,,gaygeek
"Henry Cavill just hanging out, as Superman",,gaygeek
Triangulation show interview with Kevin Rose,,gaygeek
Blizzard announces Overwatch,,gaygeek
Acai Brothers promo,,gaygeek
Shirtless Ryan Urges Oregon to Pass Measure 91 (reading),,gaygeek
Wolverine does Single Ladies,,gaygeek
finalcutking and shirtless friend,,gaygeek
Cirque Alfonse's Timber - Beards and acrobatics,,gaygeek
"Tim Cook: ""I'm Proud to be Gay""",,gaygeek
Haven Con - First LGBTQA Geek/Game Con In Texas,"Haven Con - Texas's first Geek and Gamer Convention for the LGBTQ/Allies Communities

The focus will be on Texas's local LGBTQ/Allies geek and gamer communities - coming together to show support for each other and for the industries we love! This will be a day of interactive entertainment covering video games (all generations), movies, tabletop/card gaming, and more!
We're fundraising to secure the venue now and need all the help we can get.  Vendor and Sponsor packages are available!
More information can be found at www.geeks-first.com",gaygeek
Thomas Sanders on Nerds Are Cool!,,gaygeek
The 50 Best Cosplays of New York Comic Con 2014,,gaygeek
Anyone going to DevLearn in Las Vegas later this month?,This will be my first time at DevLearn (or any e-learning/tech conference for that matter).  It seems huge!  Has anyone here gone before? ,gaygeek
Anyone going to the websummit in ireland?,Would be nice to meet gay geeks there ;-),gaygeek
Matt Smith has tons of gay sex in pre-war Germany,"Seriously. The movie's on Netflix, it's called [Christopher And His Kind](https://www.netflix.com/WiMovie/70178688?trkid=200250783), and it's the story of author Christopher Isherwood's time spent in pre-war Germany as a sex tourist. 

It was a [BBC TV movie from 2011](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Christopher_and_His_Kind_%28film%29), and I'll be damned if it doesn't play like an episode of Doctor Who meets Tales Of The City meets Cabaret. There's quite a bit of nudity, so if you've ever shipped the eleventh doctor and various background characters from history, this is the movie for you.

It's also a fascinating portrait of the rise of fascism, the place of homosexuality in a society in turmoil, and the economic roots of prostitution. But don't let that stop you... Matt Smith! Mostly naked! With naked guys!",gaygeek
What something you nerd out over hard?,"This has probably been asked before, but this subreddit is also kinda dead, and it would be pretty awesome to revitalize it, so here it goes.

What's something you're really, really, really passionate about, and what sort of things do you do to express that passion?",gaygeek
"Reducing the Boston accent, Boston Globe's Billy Baker",,gaygeek
Gynandromorphs: Dual-Sex Animals,,gaygeek
Harry Potter VS Star Wars,,gaygeek
Shirtless Italian polyglot Alberto Arrighini,,gaygeek
Freddie Fox Ice Bucket Challenge in white undies,,gaygeek
Cute guy in home made exoskeleton,,gaygeek
Scott Bradlee (Postmodern Jukebox) shirtless ALS ice bucket challenge [Facebook],,gaygeek
Aussie wakes up from a coma speaking only Mandarin (The Feed),,gaygeek
Cute white guy speaking Lebanese Arabic,,gaygeek
"Brandon Routh Joins ""Arrow"" As The Atom",,gaygeek
[Spoilers] Assassin's Creed 4 Disappointment,"I just wanted to see if I was the only one disappointed by this. Like it says in the titles, there are AC4 spoilers, so don't read on if you haven't finished the game.

Was I the only one really upset that they made James Kidd end up being Mary Read? I was really convinced and thought Kidd was really cute. Then they revealed it was Mary Read the whole time and it just ruined all my fantasies. I hope I'm not the only one who was angered by this; if so, then I apologize for wasting your time.",gaygeek
Manufacturing World Cup soccer balls,,gaygeek
Talk Nerdy To Me,,gaygeek
"The rumors of her passing were true, but she got some help from her exercise group, the White Walkers",,gaygeek
this may be the only place on reddit that gets these two references...[x-post r/asongofmemesandrage],,gaygeek
Check out these adorable Pokemon throw pillows,,gaygeek
Silicon Valley - Mean Jerk Time,,gaygeek
The math behind the greatest dick joke ever told.,,gaygeek
Sex &amp; Social Issues Survey - Help with some research please!,"Sex and Social Issues Survey

We are conducting an anonymous, online survey for men who have sex with men, about sexual practices, health, and a range of important social issues. In order to participate in the survey, you must be at least 18 years old.

The survey takes 25-30 minutes to complete and you will have the option of entering a drawing for an Amazon.com gift card.

To participate in the survey, please click the following link:
https://newpaltz.co1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_8jhttnLlsaeJQjj

This study is being carried out through researchers at the State University of New York at New Paltz.

 If you would like more information about the study and the researchers, please check out the Facebook page we have set up: www.facebook.com/sexandsocialissuessurvey2014

Thank you for your consideration and please feel free to reply to this Reddit post to contact the researchers.",gaygeek
"The Pride Adventures #1, following LGBT superheroes, now available on Comixology",,gaygeek
"Wiggle, pole dancing, and clarinet",,gaygeek
Ballet Men - Don Quixote,,gaygeek
Buddy Rey Arzeno profiled by The Advocate for his pinup art nouveau 80s/90s cartoon character series,,gaygeek
Duh Alert: Nate Silver Finds That Same-Sex Couples More Likely To Settle Down In Gay-Friendly States,,gaygeek
Kevin Wada paints LGBT superheroes The Pride in stylish Summer fashions for limited edition print,,gaygeek
MomoCon 2014 montage video,,gaygeek
Chubbies lightsaber battle,,gaygeek
Microsoft Technical Fellow Mark Russinovich,,gaygeek
Broadway Bares glasses,,gaygeek
Bromances of Future Past,,gaygeek
Special LIMITED EDITION The Pride print by Cory Smith (artist of Dynamite's MAGNUS: ROBOT FIGHTER) - Raising funds to carry on the LGBT superhero comic series!,,gaygeek
Porn star Levi Michaels (NSFW),,gaygeek
The source of drag queen Alyssa Edwards's power,,gaygeek
Batman X Superman,,gaygeek
X-Men: Days of Future Past,X-Men opens this weekend! Let us know what you thought!,gaygeek
Vada Needs Geeks,"Hey all! Apologies for the shameless plugging buuuuuuuuut

Vada Magazine is looking for new geek contributors!

We’re an LGBTQ site based in the UK but looking to expand our coverage globally! We're dedicated to sharing the insights and interests of our contributors-and we’re looking for queer enthusiasts to share what they love (and hate) about the geek world. Be it gaming, comics, anime/manga, LARP, cosplay or anything that you have a passion for Geek at Vada would love to hear from you.

Interested? Let us know! Contact our Geek Editor samparish@vadamagazine.com",gaygeek
Check out the first 5 reviews of X-Men Days Of Future Past,,gaygeek
NIGHTLIFE #2 -- new digital gay erotic comic released!,,gaygeek
Damn Star Lord is hot as F#$% In 2 New Images From Guardians Of The Galaxy,,gaygeek
Interview with choreographer Yanis Marshall,,gaygeek
Spider-Man stars in The Amazing Andrew Garfield 2,"So, what'd we think? By the way, I would give this movie 4 out of 10 on the homo-meter. One point for each shirtless shot and an extra point for some homoerotic undertones.",gaygeek
Browser extension for HRC's Corporate Equality Index data,"[thinkContext](http://www.thinkcontext.org/) is a browser extension which inserts contextually relevant progressive campaign information into your web browsing. The latest version includes data from [HRC's Corporate Equality Index](http://www.hrc.org/campaigns/corporate-equality-index), which ranks companies on corporate policies and practices pertinent to lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgender employees.

The software works by keying off of the url of the website the user is visiting, of search engine results and some text advertisements. When it sees the url of a company that it has a match for in the database it inserts an icon to let you know. The icons are colored green, yellow and red to correspond to the companies score. Hover your mouse over the icon and a dialog box appears with some more information along with a link to get a full explanation of the score.

This project is not affiliated with HRC.",gaygeek
"The Pride #2, LGBT superhero comic on Comixology now, review by Bleeding Cool",,gaygeek
Novak Djokovic and his little brother,,gaygeek
"Guy walks around Tokyo backwards, played in reverse",,gaygeek
Short Geek Survey,"Hi. I'm doing some surveying for a story I'm writing, and I'd like a few questions answered. _^

**A) Favorite comic character from this list, and why?**

1. Spawn 
2. Captain Haddock 
3. Harvey Pekar 
4. Apollo 
5. Midnighter 
6. J. Jonah Jameson 
7. Deadpool 
8. Jenny Sparks 
9. Astro Boy 
10. The Saint of Killers 
11. Green Lantern (Hal Jordan) 
12. Scott Pilgrim 
13. The Mekon 
14. Cerebus (from the comic of the same name) 
15. Daredevil 
16. Agent Graves (100 Bullets) 
17. Hellboy 
18. Dr.Strange 
19. Venom 
20. Lex Luthor 
21. Usagi Yojimbo 
22. Emma Frost 
23. Swamp Thing 
24. The Tick 
25. Johnny Alpha 
26. Marv (Sin City) 
27. Dr.Doom 
28. Deena Pilgrim 
29. Obelix 
30. Hunter Rose 
31. Captain America 
32. Wonder Woman 
33. The Punisher 
34. Halo Jones 
35. Iron Man 
36. Rorschach 
37. Death (Sandman) 
38. The Hulk 
39. Vladek Spiegelman 
40. Spider Jerusalem 
41. Jesse Custer 
42. The Thing 
43. Magneto 
44. The Joker 
45. Judge Dredd 
46. Dream (Sandman) 
47. Spiderman 
48. Wolverine 
49. John Constantine 
50. Batman 
51. Superman

**B) Favorite comic book from this list, and why?**

1. Tank Girl 
2. Scott Pilgrim 
3. Daredevil 
4. Astro City 
5. Swamp Thing 
6. New Avengers 
7. Batman 
8. Epileptic 
9. WE3 
10. Astonishing X-Men 
11. Black Hole 
12. Punisher 
13. Kingdom Come 
14. All-Star Superman 
15. Authority 
16. Wanted 
17. Blankets 
18. The Walking Dead 
19. DMZ 
20. Ex Machina 
21. Powers 
22. Palomar 
23. Violent Cases 
24. Y: The Last Man 
25. Jimmy Corrigan 
26. Fables 
27. Invisibles 
28. The Tale Of One Bad Rat 
29. 100 Bullets 
30. Criminal 
31. 300 
32. Transmetropolitan 
33. Ghost World 
34. Ultimates 
35. Preacher 
36. Hellblazer 
37. Sandman 
38. The League Of Extraordinary Gentlemen 
39. Hellboy 
40. Marvels 
41. Alice in Sunderland 
42. Judge Dredd 
43. Maus 
44. From Hell 
45. V For Vendetta 
46. Watchmen

**C) Favorite Anime from this list, and why?**

1. Fullmetal Alchemist 
2. Death Note 
3. Cowboy Bebop 
4. Spirited Away 
5. The Melancholy of Haruhi Suzumiya 
6. Princess Mononoke 
7. Elfen Lied 
8. Neon Genesis Evangelion 
9. Code Geass Lelouch of The Rebellion 
10. Bleach

**D) Favorite anime character from this list, and why?**

1. Shini Ikari 
2. Totoro 
3. Lelouch Lamperouge 
4. Monkey D. Luffy 
5. Vegeta 
6. Ichigo Kurosaki 
7. Haruhi Suzumiya 
8. Light Yagami 
9. Vash The Stampede 
10. Jubei Kibagami 
11. Arsene Lupin 
12. D (Vampire Hunter D) 
13. Motoko Kusanagi 
14. L (Death Note) 
15. Shotaro Kaneda 
16. Rei Ayanami 
17. Sailor Moon 
18. Pikachu 
19. Edward Elric 
20. Naruto Uzumaki 
21. Himura Kenshin 
22. Spike Spiegel 
23. Speed Racer 
24. Astro Boy 
25. Goku (Dragon Ball Z)

**E) Favorite Fantasy/Sci-Fi TV Series from this list, and why?**

1. Grimm 
2. Continuum 
3. Once Upon A Time 
4. Supernatural 
5. Person of Interest 
6. True Blood 
7. Arrow 
8. Reign 
9. The Walking Dead 
10. Doctor Who 
11. Sleepy Hollow 
12. Teen Wolf 
13. Orphan Black 
14. American Horror Story 
15. Game of Thrones",gaygeek
X-Men: Days of Future Past | Official Trailer 3,,gaygeek
Spider-Man x Captain America,,gaygeek
X-Men: Days of Future Past opening battle,,gaygeek
"MANLY #3, a digital gay erotic comic for only $3.50!",,gaygeek
Science Fiction Needs to Reflect that The Future is Queer (x-post /r/scifi),,gaygeek
"The Pride, an LGBT superhero comic series, has a new issue out: The Pride Adventures#2!","""I highly recommend this smart, charming, wonderful book to anyone who likes good comics. It's absolutely a pleasure to read and a clear labor of love."" - Gail Simone (Batgirl, Secret Six, Red Sonja, Tomb Raider)

The Pride follows a diverse cast of superheroes who are all LGBTQ as they come together to improve representation in the superhero community. In the main series, The Pride, they come up against resistance both of the normal and supervillainous variety, and in The Pride Adventures, we get lots of shorter self contained stories expanding on the characters and world of the series.

We've just released the first new issue of 2014, The Pride Adventures #2 featuring four new short stories, as a digital first comic.

You can learn more about The Pride and see art by our incredible team of artists including Kris Anka, W. Scott Forbes, Chris Wildgoose and more over at the Facebook Page (www.facebook.com/ThePrideComic).

You can buy The Pride online from the store at www.thepride.bigcartel.com

It's all about having more characters out there for the LGBT comic fans to relate to, and exploring ideas of diversity, representation and 'gay issues' in such a way as to show them as what they are: human issues, which affect everyone. 

Anyway, please check us out, and please let us know what you think :)",gaygeek
Pixelated double drag splits,,gaygeek
CV Dazzle (fashion as camouflage from face-detection technology),,gaygeek
Brendan Eich Steps Down as Mozilla CEO,,gaygeek
Any good gay themed books,Can any of you guys recommend me any good gay themed books? Cause the only one I have is Fallocaust by Carter Quil.,gaygeek
GaymerX2 home stretch- 90 more minutes!,"Only 90 more minutes before the **GaymerX2 Kickstarter** is over at midnight (EDT). 
Pitch in and help us finish strong! ~*You're our only hope.*~

Do it for queer visibility in the gaming world.

Do it because you're a generous, beautiful human being.
 
Do it because you plan on going and want to meet some cuties!

https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/gaymercon/gaymerx2-everyonegames",gaygeek
[BBC News] Alan Turing Institute to be set up to research big data,,gaygeek
Hot musclebear gay erotic comic -- BULLDOGS #2,,gaygeek
comic or graphic novel recomendations,hey guys I'm just starting to get into comics and grapic novels more does anyone have some good recommendations for ones with LGBT people in them? I tend to be less into  the anime type art style if that helps narrow it down,gaygeek
Two handsome cellists cover Thunderstruck,,gaygeek
A awesome sounding gay themed horrror film that needs to raise 10 more grand of its goal in the next 4 days,,gaygeek
Fire spinning guy,,gaygeek
Any Young Avengers/Wiccan+Hulkling fans out there? Would like input on this idea for a pride Tattoo based on them...,,gaygeek
My Review Of The Walking Dead “Claimed” (spoilers),,gaygeek
10 Sex Tips From Disney Movies,,gaygeek
"Holy Hell!! Heroes Is Coming Back In 2015 For 13 Episodes. I had so many crushes in that show, Peter and Sylar!",,gaygeek
Are you watching Teen Wolf?,,gaygeek
Meet The Cast Of The New Fantastic Four &amp; My 2cents On The Casting,,gaygeek
5 Reasons To Fall In Love With Chris Pratt Star-Lord,,gaygeek
"Peacekeepers, a queer-friendly Bechdel-test winning kickstarter that you should watch and share!",,gaygeek
"NIGHTLIFE #1, a gay erotic comic in digital format -- 26 pages of man-on-man smut for $3.80",,gaygeek
Twin doctors diet for science,,gaygeek
Stormtrooper Secrets: Hip Hop Twerk - 4K,,gaygeek
QueeringComics is all headcanons for gaygeeks,,gaygeek
Dr. V’s Magical Putter,,gaygeek
Anyone into Star Trek?,"Where should someone whose never seen it start?  Recently I got my boyfriend into listening 'Welcome to Night Vale' and now I want to try to get into one of his favorites things, which happens to be Star Trek.  Do I need to start at the very beginning, or is there a mid-point I can start and not miss too much?",gaygeek
"Still digesting Spike Jonze's beguiling ""Her""","Pretty much what the subject states. Saw ""Her"" yesterday. And was utterly blown away. Yes, nothing replaces the feel and experience of a physical relationship, but as computers become more engrained in our lives and become more and more intelligent, will it be more and more likely to potentially ""fall"" for an operating system (I know people who have already fallen for their XBox One)? 

Like the best sci-fi, ""Her"" skips the typical ""dystopian"" sci-fi worlds that are set up by your typical Hollywood producers and gives us a look at something that I could very well see happen in the next 20 years or so. ",gaygeek
What are your New Year's resolutions?,"**Happy New Year, everyone!!**

What would you like to see out of your 2014? Something sexy and nerdy perhaps? Let's hear it!",gaygeek
Maybe one of the best public restroom-BJs ever! NSFW!,,gaygeek
JackThreads ninja,,gaygeek
/u/Mahlerfanran/ being Super (NSFW),,gaygeek
Iron Man meets Sailor Moon,,gaygeek
Thought you gaygeeks would appreciate...,,gaygeek
"After more than 60 years, Alan Turing is given posthumous pardon of gross indecency charges [x-post /r/technology]",,gaygeek
Anyone else listen to this amazing audio drama?,,gaygeek
IT'S OFFICIAL: Marvel Confirms Paul Rudd Will Star in ANT-MAN,,gaygeek
Did another photo shoot with some co-workers as the Teen Titans...or 3 of them at least.,,gaygeek
Would it Matter if Master Chief Were Gay? | Game/Show | PBS,,gaygeek
Well 2/3 of our build team is gay.,,gaygeek
Pink Lightsaber - lunarbaboon - Comics,,gaygeek
Science of homosexuality explored in new doc - Technology &amp; Science,,gaygeek
Git would make a great wingman,,gaygeek
So what did we think of The Hunger Games: Catching Fire?,"FYI, this is a spoiler zone. Talk freely about the movie in this thread.",gaygeek
The New Gay X-Man In Today's Uncanny X-Men #14 (SPOILERS),,gaygeek
The OMEn Chronicles - Harry Potter - 4K,,gaygeek
Gayest Wedding Cake Ever,,gaygeek
A capella cover of Muse - Madness. I could stare at those furry dimples all day.,,gaygeek
Geeky slam poem,"As some of my friends are doing NaNoWriMo at the moment, I wanted to support them by joining in. However I suck at writing novels. So I decided to write and recorded a slam poem (spoken word or 'performance' poem) each day. Today's one was fairly geeky and I thought my fellow gays may be interested. 

http://youtu.be/axtb4DdGb_M

It's short, for those who don't like long poems. ",gaygeek
Gays Find a Home at ComicCon,,gaygeek
Speak Out Poll: Are you boycotting Ender’s Game?,,gaygeek
"Orson Scott Card: Mentor, Friend, Bigot | A Queer Woman's Perspective",,gaygeek
"Orson Scott Card Calls Backlash To Anti-Gay Views 'Savage, Lying Deceptive Personal Attacks' (The man who said that he'd overthrow the government by force if it allowed marriage equality for LGBT citizens)",,gaygeek
Mario....Anyone....,,gaygeek
TIL: The Creator of Big Bird was gay: Kermit Love (no relation to the Frog. ;) ),,gaygeek
Alan Turing Honoured At Awards: 'The Gay Man Who Saved The World',,gaygeek
New York Comic-Con Cosplay,,gaygeek
"Meet Zimmer Barnes, The Real-Life Gay Superhero",,gaygeek
"Marvel’s Loki to have gay romance, become a woman",,gaygeek
"Renaissance fair costume of ""Gandalf the Gay/Pink/Fabulous"" (x-post LGBT)",,gaygeek
"/r/BaltimoreGaymers is having its inaugural meetup this weekend, if you're in the area, come join us!","Just looking to meet and make friends in the Baltimore area!

[Come join us!](https://www.reddit.com/r/BaltimoreGaymers/comments/1p1qlp/casual_gaymers_meetup_this_saturday/)

Questions are welcome",gaygeek
House of Hades Spoiler-Chapter 36,,gaygeek
[VLOG] LGBT in Role Playing and Tabletop Games: Geeking Out,,gaygeek
[Science] Foot cream kills HIV by tricking cells to commit suicide,,gaygeek
Top Gay Superheroes – GCG's favorites,,gaygeek
Ada Lovelace– The Origin,,gaygeek
The Future Is Never Transgressive Enough [Speculating on the the future of queer superheroes],,gaygeek
Marvel Dismisses Female Superheroes,,gaygeek
Markiplier pole dancing,,gaygeek
"Meet Jack: Scientist, inventor, kayaking enthusiast, ‘Glee’ fan, likes boys, … and is only 16",,gaygeek
[Geek and Sundry Vlogs - Geeking Out] Neil McNeil at the Kingdom Hearts 1.5 HD ReMix Launch Party,,gaygeek
Gay.net - John Barrowman Gets Cheeky for the NOH8 Campaign,,gaygeek
GLSEN to Honor 'Ender's Game' Production Company (for something other than 'Ender's Game'),,gaygeek
More Details On HBO’s ’Looking’ :: EDGE on the Net,,gaygeek
Coming Out Then and Now: The Impact of Technology,,gaygeek
TV Legends Revealed | ‘Star Trek: TNG’ Wouldn’t Air Episode With Gay Crewmen? – Spinoff Online,,gaygeek
Has DC Comics Done Something Stupid Today?,,gaygeek
Sir Ian McKellen to play retired Sherlock Holmes in new film,,gaygeek
John Barrowman says he didn't get up one morning and decide to be gay,,gaygeek
Batwoman writers quit after superhero's wedding 'prohibited',,gaygeek
Doctor Who star Russell Tovey lands first major US role in gay drama,,gaygeek
So who's going to DragonCon?,"Needless to say, I am.  :)",gaygeek
Bobak Ferdowsi's public service announcement,,gaygeek
Star Trek Actor to Receive Gay Advocacy Award :: EDGE on the Net,,gaygeek
Princeton Educated hottie Wentworth Miller comes out!,,gaygeek
"﻿Prison Break Star Wentworth Miller Comes Out as Gay (Yes, I'm submitting it twice... but it's my cake day and I've been waiting for him to come out forever)",,gaygeek
Why the ‘gay geek’ is the most sought-after worker in London,,gaygeek
LGBT Highlights From Comic-Con International 2013,,gaygeek
"I want to rub my face on his beard. Also, his version of Star Wars is amazing.",,gaygeek
Queer Comics Conference in Montreal,,gaygeek
PHOTOS: Gay Couple Has Batman-Themed Wedding / Queerty,,gaygeek
What shows are you watching? And why?,"What shows are you watching? I keep seeing things for ""Once Upon a Time"" and thinking that I should be watching it.
 
I'm watching ""Under the Dome"" and ""Teen Wolf"". I amused by the pandering to a gay audience in ""Teen Wolf"" but at least they are being respectful by having a gay couple in the show. I hope the twins are sticking around in the long term. I think they could switch to not being evil.
",gaygeek
Gamasutra - EA at GaymerX: LGBT inclusivity harms no one's bottom line,,gaygeek
WATCH: Kevin Keller's First Gay Kiss,,gaygeek
Gay.net - WATCH: Geekiest Gay Marriage Proposal Ever?,,gaygeek
BOND'S Q COMES OUT AS GAY,,gaygeek
[found] Smoke ring-mancer,,gaygeek
Gender Swapping - JEAN GREY (MARVEL 1602),,gaygeek
Public Domain Superheroes - I'll let you figure out the relevance. :),,gaygeek
Trask Industries - promo site for X-Men: Days of Future Past,,gaygeek
Microsoft and Google join forces to launch LGBT geeks forum,,gaygeek
Stan Lee's Reaction To A Bisexual Spider-Man,,gaygeek
"first thing I searched for was my usual ""Inspirational"" sites",,gaygeek
Chess grandmaster Magnus Carlsen,,gaygeek
Michelle Rodriguez Made Me Cry at Comic-Con,,gaygeek
James McAvoy Will Play Dr. Frankenstein to Daniel Radcliffe's Igor,,gaygeek
Geeking Out #6: PRISM Comics and Husbands the Series at San Diego Comic-Con,,gaygeek
So... The Wolverine. Thoughts?,"Awkward. Japanese. And shirtless.

Stayed for the shirtless.",gaygeek
Benedict Cumberbatch Officiates Gay Wedding In Lieu Of Comic-Con,,gaygeek
GaymerX convention,"With the GaymerX Gaymer Connect convention coming up next week, i'm wondering how many reddit gaygeeks are going. Who will be there?",gaygeek
A little Hulk-Thing Subtext,,gaygeek
Blurred Lines gender swap,,gaygeek
[Science] Same-Sex Attraction Not Contagious Among Adolescents,,gaygeek
Tom Stuart on impossible programs,,gaygeek
J.K.Rowling and Daniel Radcliffe and discussing the fact that Dumbledore is gay,,gaygeek
Enigma codebreaker Alan Turing to be given posthumous pardon | UK news,,gaygeek
Let's Make An All Gay X-Men Team,,gaygeek
Archie Comics gay character Kevin Keller becomes part of It Gets Better campaign,,gaygeek
Your Queer Guide to Comic-Con 2013,,gaygeek
Gay Superhero Talks Doping In 1991,,gaygeek
Michael B Jordan reacts to Andrew Garfield’s gay Spiderman romance idea,,gaygeek
"Famed Star Trek and Sci-Fi Writer David Gerrold Slams Orson Scott Card Over ""Tolerance"" Beg",,gaygeek
Figured I'd xPost from gaybros. Anyone else got geeky tattoos?,,gaygeek
An Animated Wonder Woman Like You've Never Seen Her Before!,,gaygeek
Skip Ender's Game Boycott - Don't give Orson Scott Card money to continue his work with NOM,,gaygeek
Matt Mitcham for Funky Trunks 2011,,gaygeek
I thought you guys were appreciate this (x-post from /r/funny),,gaygeek
All-American Boy by Steve Grand,,gaygeek
Young Justice x Sailor Moon,,gaygeek
Hey fellow GayGeeks. Be needing some wedding rings now?,,gaygeek
What aspects of gay dating would you like to see reflected in a dating sim card game?,"I am making a card game in which the player makes successful dice rolls against questions in 12 different categories (sport, technology, food, etc.) and there are event cards that reflect the goings-on around the date at the restaurant. There are people of all races, disabled people, non-monogamous, hippies, business types, people just out for sex... the basic variety you'd get if you put an ad up on Craigslist. What aspects of dating do you think are underrepresented in dating sims? What aspects of gay culture do you think are important for this type of thing, if any? I want this to represent gay dating in a big city, but I only lived in the city for a short time so I don't have that much experience. Thoughts?",gaygeek
I regret not watching Battlestar Galactica sooner...,,gaygeek
"Sean Maher Discusses Joss Whedon, Gay Adoption And The Impact Of Coming Out / Queerty",,gaygeek
"Dave Franco, sleight of hand to hand combat",,gaygeek
The Gay Comics List,,gaygeek
"Good, geek-friendly dating sites?","Where I'm from, there aren't really a lot of choices for gay men when it comes to the dating scene, so when you add in the fact that I'm pretty geeky, it becomes even more difficult. I tried checking out OKCupid, but even that seems like a dead-end. I'm looking for a safe site where the people will at least respond to my messages, lol. Any help would be great! I'll be your best friend!",gaygeek
Grandpa reminds me that I'm a 3rd generation geek. Anyone else?,"I'm on a fishing/camping with my grandpa, dad, bro, uncles and cousins.

My grandpa says ""You gotta see my new gadget"". He pulls out a watch and a buoy and says its a wireless depth checker. It transmits the depth to his watch if he casts it out into the water. 

Followed up by my grandpas usual conversation about his first computer (a Commodore) and how he still hates Dos to this day. 

My grandpa always has new gadgets. He showed up to my brothers wedding (2 years ago) with this odd pair of glasses that recorded video and took pictures. He's always been way ahead of the curb. Lol",gaygeek
13-Minute 'Man of Steel' Featurette,,gaygeek
My Secret Geekiest Thing - Neil's Nerdy Tattoos,,gaygeek
"It Gets Better - ""Out &amp; Allied @ JSC Employee Resource Group"" of NASA's Johnson Space Center [x-post r/gaybros]",,gaygeek
Geeking Out #2: The Trials and Tribulations of Geek Dating,,gaygeek
Comic Book Illustrates Gay History,,gaygeek
"Doctor Who: The Musical? (Ya, it really has nothing to do with being gay... but Doctor Who! Musical! and many more surprises!)",,gaygeek
This place needs to be far more active ;(,"It's just like /r/gaymers but far more expansive in its subject...  
You'd think folks with interests outside of gaming could congregate here.  
I like games, but I like all kinds of other geeky stuff too :/ 
and /r/gaymers tends to stick with that small sliver of subject",gaygeek
A Gay Sci-Fi - Gay Themed Film,,gaygeek
Geek &amp; Sundry: Geeking Out #1: Crackship Showdown,,gaygeek
Setting up an online comic store in the UK,"Hi guys

Can I ask any comic lovers to fill out this quick survey. Hoping to set up an online store sometime this year, catering to the UK and Ireland mainly and would love to hear from you. 

http://www.surveymonkey.com/s/ZYR77W2",gaygeek
Star Trek's History of Progressive Values — And Why It Faltered on LGBT Crew Members,,gaygeek
Gay Comedian Jonny McGovern: Batman Has A Kiki,,gaygeek
A qualitative and statistical analysis of bears (don't just speculate; be a geek and enumerate!),,gaygeek
John Barrowman: I'm ready,,gaygeek
"Rut nga’chuq loDpu’, rut nga’chuq be’pu’. YiqimHa’!",,gaygeek
The Tragic tale of Frank and Steve (On TableTop),,gaygeek
BriTANick - Sexy Pool Party,,gaygeek
Betty White Girl Problems,,gaygeek
New Frontiers,,gaygeek
Science + Online Dating = Success?,,gaygeek
How Strong is Your Kung-Fu?,"Surely, I simply cannot be the only gay man who has a thing for kung-fu movies?

Not just classic Kung-Fu, with the three saints of Hong Kong cinema (being, of course, Bruce Lee, Jackie Chan, and Sonny Chiba).  Not to mention ""Ol' Dirty"" Yuen Siu-tien and the lot.  A thousand iterations of the same story, but you still love the same ol' story every time.

Not just the middle era with all the ""cable-fu"" - movies with Aaron Kwok and other dancers-made-fighters flying through the air.  With disconnected, dyspeptic stories that make *no sense* are just one long non-sequitur.

And not just the recent Kung-Fu revival, with Stephen Chow bringing back the old guard, with stories that make sense and are actually slightly different from each other.  I don't just mean *Shaolin Soccer* or *Kung-Fu Hustle*, but also stuff like *Detective Dee* or *Taichi Zero*.  With the exception of maybe jumping off a building and gracefully landing, or maybe hitting someone so hard they go flying, the special effects and cables are really toned down and actual fighters with actual skill take center stage.

Now, I'm sure I accept the fact that I'm one of the few gay men out there who also has a thing for the classic Luchador films (Vampire?  screw garlic; jump off the top ropes.  Werewolf?  screw silver; suplex.  Evil sorcer?  headscissor takedown), but I somehow refuse to live on assuming there are no other gay men who collect kung fu movies.

Or is this more of a /gaygeek topic, or more for the /gaybros?  Kung fu from the 60s and 70s makes me think ""geek"", though I suppose the fundamentally badass nature of the genre perhaps speaks more to ""bros""?",gaygeek
"A more ""pure"" geek?","There's an idea that's been bugging me for a while, and I just wanted to see what other people thought of it; does a geek obsession get ""ruined"" by sexualizing it?  I mean... if it's already sexy, then obviously not.  Sexualizing John Creighton from Farscape or 7 of 9 is just... proper, really.  I mean really now... Ben Bowder....  

But anyway, let me explain.

I remember when Queer as Folk was first remade in the USA, and the change in geek obsession really bothered me.  In the original UK version, Vince was all about Dr Who, and had every episode made so far (this was before the ultra-cool reboot, and even seemed to have the episodes from the 60s).  Although he wasn't exactly averse to getting laid, there were other times when he was like ""can't screw now; sci fi is on"".  His loving Dr Who wasn't about sex or fetishes or any of that - he was just a fan of the thing.

Then in the USA version, Mike's character was obsessed with comics, but not because of the politics or story-telling or speculative fiction side or any of the stuff that most geeks who love comics love them for.  Oh no.  They made it seem like it was all about muscled guys running around in spandex.  I don't recall them ever once talking about metaphors or social commentary; just bulges.  It didn't seem authentic to me.  There's sex and romance and whatnot in comics, of course, but it's only half the story.  If you ignore the content and only focus on the superficial fleshy bits it seems to me that you're not really a ""geek"" so much as you are just a soft-core appreciator who happens to enjoy alternative sources for titillation.

Does anybody else get this feeling? ",gaygeek
I was told by the bros that this would fit in here! My Arcanine tattoo,,gaygeek
Comic Sansa,,gaygeek
My own qwerty cube mod,,gaygeek
"It’s a bird, it’s a plane, it’s a gay comic book superhero",,gaygeek
I cackled loudly at this scene in the IT Crowd.,,gaygeek
New York Comic Con,Is anyone planning on gong this year? I had to miss last year (very upset about that) but I went the two previous years and had a fantastic time. Despite some organization/crowd control issues (and one particularly despicable staffer with a beret and a bullhorn two years ago) I think they do a pretty good job. Anyone else frequent the con?,gaygeek
Seeing this today - Ghibli studios has a way of making me fall for every lead dude in their pictures,,gaygeek
"I present to you all, Sassy Sailor Moon",,gaygeek
The IT Crowd has some of the best moments in tv,,gaygeek
Am I the only one always having a huge crush for tech guys in sci-fi tv shows?,"Henry in Sanctuary
http://www.themovienetwork.ca/series/sanctuary/images/photo-henry.jpg

Seamus Harper in Andromeda
http://www.andromeda-web.com/gallery/harper002.jpg

Wash in Firefly
http://images3.wikia.nocookie.net/__cb20080301062348/firefly/images/f/fa/Wash.jpg

And so on...
Don't know why, maybe tools turn me on :P
",gaygeek
"Artistic depiction of Disney's princes and heroes, Chippendales style! (x-post /r/gay )",,gaygeek
Gay.net - Why Gays Should Be Howling for ‘Teen Wolf’ (x-post with /r/gay ),,gaygeek
Gay comics geek says hello!  (Self-pic),,gaygeek
A Music Homage to Gay Icon Alan Turing,,gaygeek
9 Gay Leaders Making a Difference in Technology,,gaygeek
I chuckle a bit when I saw the logo for the Journal of Health and Quality of Life Outcomes when doing my research. Happy Monday...err Tuesday :),,gaygeek
The 50 Sexiest Male Characters in Comics - ComicsAlliance,,gaygeek
"Petitioners are boycotting the selection of author Orson Scott Card, who is to pen Superman Digital First",,gaygeek
FAQNP's a queer nerd publication.,,gaygeek
How are gay people's brains different from heterosexual's brains?,,gaygeek
Benedict Cumberbatch set to play gay WW2 genius Alan Turing,,gaygeek
"SCIENCE! Hosted by a cute guy of course: ""Tales from the Prep Room"" series",,gaygeek
Cute guy lecturing about the Traveling Salesman problem,,gaygeek
How I feel [xkcd],,gaygeek
Guy comes out of closet on Facebook to friends who are entirely too geeky to care.,,gaygeek
"Even if ""Gay Geek"" is not a label he would choose to identify with, He is an individual worthy of respect. RIP Aaron Swartz.",,gaygeek
The Next Hyper-operator,,gaygeek
"So, after being persuaded to watch Battlestar Galactica...","...from start to finish, I have been left yearning for some more quality sci-fi. Any ideas what I can possibly watch now? ",gaygeek
"So I want to do cosplay, but I'm not muscled and kinda chubby... Ideas? ",,gaygeek
rebel scum (X-post from r/funny),,gaygeek
Cob house construction (shirtless sustainability),,gaygeek
2012 gift lists,What are you asking for this holiday season? Links and lists!,gaygeek
Robert Jordan was a sexy nerd!,,gaygeek
Found another boardgaymer and blushing.,,gaygeek
Apple hires trans Windows security expert,,gaygeek
I think he's a keeper,,gaygeek
Stephen Fry: What I wish I'd known when I was 18,,gaygeek
A new subreddit for all the gay guys and gals out there in relationships or more.,,gaygeek
Watching this and I got a crush on LinusTechTips' camera man: Slick :),,gaygeek
Conner Habib - Intellectual Porn Star?!? (NSFW),,gaygeek
Intel to Boy Scouts: no more donations if you don't drop anti-gay policy (x-post from /r/LGBT),,gaygeek
"Chris Hardwick (Nerdist) tonight on Comedy Central, 11/10c","PSA, Chris Hardwick of Nerdist fame is doing his stand up special, Mandroid!",gaygeek
"Nate Silver, statistics geek and successful election predictor (and he's gay)",,gaygeek
Daniel Tammet: Different ways of knowing ,,gaygeek
Space jumper Felix Baumgartner,,gaygeek
Programmer Jeff Preshing,,gaygeek
Mathematician Zach Harris,,gaygeek
Vintage Apple ad,,gaygeek
Walking Dead - Michonne's walkers (x-post from r/WalkingDead),,gaygeek
"Katana crossplay, New York Comic Con 2012",,gaygeek
Brian O'Malley's Young Avengers Cover Variant - I think I just nerdgasmed.,,gaygeek
Rubik's Cube solving and shirtless push-ups,,gaygeek
More Young Avengers coming in January! :),,gaygeek
"Billy, The Vampire Slayer",,gaygeek
what are your favorite browser extensions?,"i'll start:  

* [Ghostery](http://ghostery.com) (a nice tracking+ad blocker)
* [Lastpass](http://lastpass.com) (a secure password manager)
* NoScript (a javascript blocker)
* [Pocket](http://getpocket.com) (an easy bookmark manager)
* [RES](http://www.reddit.com/r/Enhancement)",gaygeek
Marvel drag battle,,gaygeek
OUT in IT: Jon “maddog” Hall opens up about being in OUT [xpost r/OpenSource],,gaygeek
"Some guy at work who knows I'm gay saw me watching SG-1 on my laptop, looked surprised and said ""Are there lots of gays that like SciFi?"" My response...",,gaygeek
Nerd boner: the men of Pitch Perfect,,gaygeek
"So I was at the newsagent buying a copy of ""Linux Format"" and a copy of ""Gay Pages""...","... and I got a *really* weird look from the cashier.

I'm not sure which one it was for, or if it was for the combination of the two, but it made me think of you, [/r/gaygeek](/r/gaygeek)s",gaygeek
Gangnam Style for Math Nerds,,gaygeek
"Ph.D. student alleges he was sexually harassed, unfairly fired",,gaygeek
Gender bending Naruto characters,,gaygeek
Arrrrrgh i am going to do nanowrimo in November. This place may become my emotional dumping ground,"This place may become my emotional dumping ground. I apologize in advance.

Anyone else gonna do nanowrimo this year?",gaygeek
Sometimes seeing a Doctor can brighten your day. :),,gaygeek
&lt;blink&gt; if you love DILFs,,gaygeek
John Barrowman and Scott Gill at Dragon*Con,,gaygeek
Master flautists and engineers,,gaygeek
"""Is that a Tri-Force tramp stamp?"" [slightly NSFW]",,gaygeek
"Is anyone else disturbed by Barney's Christmas campaign turning Disney characters into ""models""?",,gaygeek
It's A Good Day,,gaygeek
Fall is almost here! Can't wait to start sporting this around campus again. What is your favorite nerd swag?,,gaygeek
"Did a photo shoot for fun with some friends, I was the Human Torch",,gaygeek
Supernatural [NSFW],,gaygeek
"Mako, You Can Bend My Fire Any Time",,gaygeek
Hawk + NASA engineer = Bobak Ferdowsi,,gaygeek
Scientists measure eye dilation vs sexuality,,gaygeek
Pride Dice,,gaygeek
The Gay Force,,gaygeek
Call Me Maybe cover (Nick Blaemire and the Hustle),,gaygeek
A Great Pair of Characters in Doctor Who [x-post r/doctorwho],,gaygeek
New Apple commercials guy,,gaygeek
Josh Rabinowitz (new Apple guy) @ CollegeHumor,,gaygeek
"Is it just me, or am I the only one excited for this?",,gaygeek
Well-Strung second violinist Chris Marchant,,gaygeek
Bunker to get boyfriend Vibe,,gaygeek
Superheroes of Comic-Con,,gaygeek
"First Female U.S. Astronaut, Sally Ride, Comes Out In Obituary",,gaygeek
/r/gayjews? Now open! What would your mother think?,,gaygeek
Can exothermic love be found on Grindr?,,gaygeek
Moments in gay vs geek,"We've all had our moments. Where we're trapped between something nerdy and something sexy.

Regale us with tales of when your geek side trumped your gay side.",gaygeek
"Took this for another subreddit but I'm so happy I'll post it here, too",,gaygeek
SDCC this weekend?,Anyone else going to be there?,gaygeek
13 Reasons Why Andrew Garfield Is The Best Spider-Man Ever,,gaygeek
"Holy Happy 4th of July, Batman!",,gaygeek
UC Men's Octet - Vogue,,gaygeek
I installed Windows 3.1 on my phone just for the hell of it. What pointless geeky things have you done?,,gaygeek
Nightwing Gangbang (NSFW),,gaygeek
Wonder Girl and Super Boy (/r/youngjustice),,gaygeek
Statistically significant,,gaygeek
I haz a dating question...,"I'd ask r/gaymers since it seems to be more active, but I think I identify myself more as just a gay geek, so I'll ask you guys.

I'm in my mid-20s, average looking, mild stutter, never been in a relationship, never gone on a second date with anyone. I'll meet a guy (generally on Grindr or OkCupid cuz I'm terrible at meeting guys) who seems to be relationship material, sometimes the guy doesn't just want sex. We'll text a lot, he is either interested or is just nice, then maybe after a week it starts to take longer for him to respond to texts, or he just doesn't respond at all. If I do get him answering, he says he's busy. This happens A LOT! In fact, I'd even venture to say it happens every time.

I'm 95% sure what I'm saying in the texts and the frequency of the texts are not what is driving them off. How do I know the guy just lost interest, he really is busy, or I actually am crazy? I met the basically perfect guy (he's in my league, he has my dream job, he's really nice and funny, etc) but he takes a LONG time to respond to texts, or he doesn't respond at all. I finally went on a date with him and it seemed perfectly normal; we both equally talked and laughed and such, we didn't kiss or do anything more at the end, and he TOLD me to keep texting him, but he continued to 'be busy.'

I have many people who can vouch for my sanity, so am I just meeting assholes or what?",gaygeek
"Alan Turing: Murdered for being who he is after being a hero, saving those who were murdered for being who they were",,gaygeek
Nightwing (Young Justice),,gaygeek
Grindr heat map,,gaygeek
Call Maybe Me a cappella,,gaygeek
James Adomian as Tim Gunn (Sklarbro Country),,gaygeek
Eliad Cohen with iPad,,gaygeek
Dreamers Fighter part 2 teaser,,gaygeek
100th birthday of Alan Turing approaches,,gaygeek
Spiderman and Venom themed Reeboks!,,gaygeek
You can hunt my bounty any day (NSFW),,gaygeek
Missed my cake day but think this would've got a lot of Karma since Reddit loves cats,,gaygeek
I need a minute after watching this - Sexy Nerd.,,gaygeek
Jim Parsons Comes Out As Gay: 'Big Bang Theory',,gaygeek
Northstar's Wedding,,gaygeek
Spider Man super preview,,gaygeek
"Young Justice, anyone?","I'm late to the Young Justice party... And two things stick out.

1. Superboy is shirtless. **Frequently.**

SEASON 1 SPOILER ALERT

~~2. Superboy is essentially the gay baby of Lex and Superman.~~",gaygeek
Awesome marriage equality sign (xpost r/lgbt),,gaygeek
The Doctor costume... How'd I do?,,gaygeek
Avengers. Go see it!,"Apparently there was a scene with Scarjo's booty that was a big deal... But silly me, I didn't notice.

But what I did notice... Mr. Evans does not disappoint! Whedon is an equal opportunity director!",gaygeek
Just Something My Friends Did Today,,gaygeek
Before you Protest Gay Days at Disney...,,gaygeek
Gambit (X-Men) x Ken (Street Fighter) x Hayato Kanzaki (Star Gladiator) x Rikuo (Darkstalkers) (NSFW) (crossposted to r/gaymers and r/yaoi),,gaygeek
"Cute web developer rockstar, Faruk Ateş",,gaygeek
"Gay Comic Geek reviews ""Demonic Sex Issue Number 1"" at ManCast",,gaygeek
I so want to lick those abs,,gaygeek
Sometimes I find Guy Gardner hot. Sometimes.,,gaygeek
Nightwing (also crossposted to r/gaymers),,gaygeek
Superheroes!,,gaygeek
Emphatic Peeta (Is He Wearing YMLA?!),,gaygeek
Adventure Time! (also crossposted to r/gaymers),,gaygeek
"So they're rerunning Stargate SG-1, now I got my crush on this guy back",,gaygeek
JavaScript inventor gave $1000 to ban gay marriage,,gaygeek
Going to prom with my geek!,,gaygeek
/r/gaygeek official candy :),,gaygeek
Sex + Lasers = Awesome,"My straight friend just IM'd me to tell me that ""Glow-in-the-dark condoms + Violet Laser = Awesome Fun""

This is how I know he's found the right girl.

I assume that meant that his gf got to draw pictures on his penis with the laser, but my immediate thought was Lightsaber battles.

Has anyone else tried this?",gaygeek
Replace the girl with NPH and I think we've got a Dr. Horrible sequel.,,gaygeek
My geeky friends' response when I came out...,,gaygeek
PAX East anyone?,I can't wait. Last year was so much fun. Anyone else going?,gaygeek
"Is that so, Frozen Planet?",,gaygeek
"Q: ""Scrotal Cannon"". Mega Man or Iron Man?","The phrase ""scrotal cannon"" just popped into my head. Not sure why. Maybe it sounds like orbital cannon?",gaygeek
"My husband, Kevin Rose, will join Google",,gaygeek
Q: Batman or Superman?,So I've been catching 1 Girl 5 Gays and despite the silly title it's actually a pretty awesome show. It puts me in the mood to interview people... So maybe we can take a stab.,gaygeek
Cute new GitHubber,,gaygeek
Hot Jedi action,,gaygeek
Trouble w/ Legalizing Human-Robot Marriage - the RPG,,gaygeek
Kotaku salutes trans game designer Dani Bunten,,gaygeek
"""What can [people] do against such reckless hate?”","I was watching ""The Two Towers"" again. Extended HD versions... and I came across that quote. That's what anti-LGBT sentiment seems to me. Reckless hate. 

There is so much LGBT allegory in the Lord of the Rings. 

And at the center of it all is a relationship between two people of the same gender who care so deeply for each other that it sustains them against all odds. Their relationship may be platonic but it is intimate and substantial in ways that if I found romantic relationship that was half that, I would be not for want.

*""My Sam""*
",gaygeek
Stripe founders Patrick and John Collison,,gaygeek
Casey Schreiner micro AMA ,,gaygeek
xpost from r/videos: Where do I sign up!?,,gaygeek
[NSFW language] Seems like Wolverine has a sensible solution,,gaygeek
Perhaps the gaygeek antithesis but gay bros can be geeks too!,,gaygeek
Discontent: Not a review of Sherlock Holmes: A Game Of Shadows,,gaygeek
Joel Spolsky on board of upcoming NYC software school,,gaygeek
Gayqueery?,"If there were a JavaScript framework targeted to the homosexual web developer, what would it actually do?

[FEATURE] Enables any two DOM nodes of the same element type to marry().",gaygeek
Saturn gaymer tattoo,,gaygeek
Addicting music making app/game - 'Pulsate',,gaygeek
"Happy holidays, gay geeks!","Happy holidays, guys and gals! Did you get any geeky/gay holiday loot? If so, post here!",gaygeek
Sexy engineer Grant Imahara,,gaygeek
Lazy and I Know It,,gaygeek
"Swords to Plowshares, Duel Decks edition",,gaygeek
Sci-Fi and Homophobia: Should I care? ,"I've taken to publicly denouncing Orson Scott Card every time that something on reddit comes up that's associated with him. Lately it's mostly been with the movie recreation of ""Ender's Game"". 

OSC is a deeply homophobic man and uses his position and fame to promote discrimination and disinformation against the LGBT community.

Some would argue that I should let his work stand on his own... but i have a problem with financially supporting a man who's goals are to inhibit or eliminate me from having the same rights as other people. 

Am I too hardlined? Ender's Game is pretty consistently in the top 10 sci-fi novels of all time. ",gaygeek
"Definitely not suggestive of anything - Also, for Science!",,gaygeek
CES 2012 anyone?,I'll be at CES 2012 in Jan and I wanted to see if any other /gaygeek(s) were going. Are you exhibiting? What are you looking forward to seeing?,gaygeek
"Brian Kibler, the face of Magic: The Gathering",,gaygeek
Cute guy talkin bout Google Chrome,,gaygeek
Being hairy.. FOR SCIENCE!,,gaygeek
I guess it's not water soluble...,,gaygeek
Pressure grows for a Turing pardon,,gaygeek
Can't bring myself to subscribe...,,gaygeek
Nerd squeeze (100% NSFW),,gaygeek
TIL Matthew Inman from The Oatmeal is hot.,,gaygeek
Tap this,,gaygeek
"Java cutie, Andrew Lee Rubinger",,gaygeek
Cute pyro action,,gaygeek
My first world problem of the week,,gaygeek
Alan Turing petitioner AMA,,gaygeek
Paintball pink,,gaygeek
Star Wears (/r/askreddit sexiest photo thread comments),,gaygeek
Hot gay robot,,gaygeek
"Gay Naturalist David Mizejewski with Ross Mathews, Chelsea Lately",,gaygeek
RuPaul's Drag Race Season 4 trailer,,gaygeek
Freerunner Damien Walters,,gaygeek
I have a crush on Andrew Rannells ,,gaygeek
Iron jaw (100% NSFW),,gaygeek
Club Cybertron,,gaygeek
Sassy civil engineer,,gaygeek
Nerdy bear with iPhone (NSFW),,gaygeek
Super dicks (NSFW),,gaygeek
Like an animal,,gaygeek
The first person that told me that being different is okay (It's isn't always easy...),,gaygeek
Sassy gay chemist,,gaygeek
Gay Geek Costume Thread!,"I'm sure we all had some fun/geeky/gay costumes this year so show them off!

I was a [""sexy borg""](http://i.imgur.com/7PwF4.jpg)",gaygeek
Normally distributed,,gaygeek
Adobe cuties,,gaygeek
"Renegade prototype android soldier, human colony boy, sci-fi mindfuck + sexytimes",,gaygeek
Look what I found over at r/startrek! ,,gaygeek
20something ent.,,gaygeek
"Christmas, animated (NSFW)",,gaygeek
Supernatural [NSFW],,gaygeek
"Rubik's juggler, David Calvo",,gaygeek
Cute ninjas (live action Naruto),,gaygeek
Shirtless for climate change,,gaygeek
I'm starting a vlog if anyone is interested in following :)(xpost from gaymers),,gaygeek
Zachary Quinto comes out,,gaygeek
DC: New 52 : Stormwatch - Anyone else reading it to see how they'll re-introduce Midnighter and Apollo's relationship?,,gaygeek
Fight hydrophobia and molecular discrimination!,,gaygeek
Physics is to math,,gaygeek
Reading time,,gaygeek
Seeing as it's coming out day...,,gaygeek
Please use the NSFW flag,"I'm totally not a prude and I don't mind NSFW content but at the same time, I'd like to be able to read this subreddit at work. I hope that's there's more to being a gay geek than NSFW content.

When deciding to use the NSFW flag, just ask yourself: ""If my manager or HR walked by, would they have a legitimate case for firing me for the content of the post?"".

Sure you can wear underwear in public without being arrested but it's a firable offense to only wear underwear at work. NSFW has to be a stricter standard than what is legal.



",gaygeek
/r/gayreads: New subreddit for fans of LGBT-themed reading,,gaygeek
Last Friday Night (sign language),,gaygeek
Six pack geek gallery,,gaygeek
Gaygeek Fantasy Bait #5,,gaygeek
Gaygeek Fantasy Bait #3,,gaygeek
Gaygeek Fantasy #4 (Tag-Team),,gaygeek
Me being my Gaygeek self. ,,gaygeek
Perfect cumshot (100% NSFW),,gaygeek
Gaygeek Fantasy Bait #2,,gaygeek
Gaygeek fantasy bait.,,gaygeek
Chess promotion,,gaygeek
Weird Science needs to be remade...,...for us! And we can call it Queer'd Science.,gaygeek
Sexy Bookworms to get us through Hump Day,,gaygeek
Fabulous Magic deck,,gaygeek
An Amazing DragonCon 2011 Cosplay Compilation,,gaygeek
And now I hate fox just a little more for cancelling Firefly,,gaygeek
Gay economy,,gaygeek
Gay-Nerds.com is looking for a few good men/women,"Hiya!

This is a xpost from LGBT and gaymers but basically, I founded a site for gay nerds last year and we've been slowly growing and stuff. We've done a couple of cool things like interviewing Margaret Cho, Kirby Krackle, Daniel Ketchum, etc. or just other feature articles like our S2 games expose or our ""Are All Gay Guys Healers?"" article.

We want to expand what we currently cover and when I was thinking about where to find a couple of gay guys/girls who were nerdy and witty, well, I came here :)

Here's a link to what we're looking for specifically but if you want to help out in some other way, let me know!

http://gay-nerds.com/site/website-news/gay-nerds-wants-you/",gaygeek
"Cute, witty GitHub guy",,gaygeek
"Aang, the Last Airbender, all growed up (x-post from LGBT)",,gaygeek
Zombies. Eww.,,gaygeek
The NeverEnding Story was one of my movies as a kid. (I admit that this is a bit karma-whoring but it will make you laugh),,gaygeek
Probably of the Best Cosplay I've Seen ,,gaygeek
iLuminate gives me a geekgaysm everytime (X-post from r/videos),,gaygeek
RIP Andy Whitfield (Spartacus),,gaygeek
Oracle,,gaygeek
"Define ""straight acting""","Despite how you may feel personally, there's definitely a subset of the gay community that is attracted to men who are described as ""straight acting"".

I seek the aid of my brainy brethren to attack this problem scientifically... Is it possible to come up with a set of attributes or a heuristic that determines if a given person, gay or straight (or bi or queer!), is ""straight acting""?

I have one theory, but I'd like to hear your thoughts!",gaygeek
Here's a picture of me from Genericon two years ago! Anyone know who I'm cosplaying as? I'm the boy with the bunny.,,gaygeek
OMG!!! Rainbow Dividers in CSS3!!!,,gaygeek
Leonardo and Raphael,,gaygeek
Do it like a chemist,,gaygeek
"Hello, fellow gay geeks!",Just wanted to show my love for you all. You guys are awesome =)!,gaygeek
New Superman,,gaygeek
"""Foo Fighters: Hot Buns (uncensored version)."" What a great way to announce your tour.",,gaygeek
Wonderella's Pride:  The Robot Version,,gaygeek
Scarlet Betch : darling gay boys go on about comics,,gaygeek
Planning a trip. Where are some gay-friendly places you have traveled to and what did you do there? [xpost Gaymers],,gaygeek
Any decent Queer Anime/Manga worth checking out?,"I've watched Gravitation and I'm currently reading/watching No.6 but most of the gay manga and anime tend to be a bit creepy at times... I'd be curious to know what people considered the best?

Thoughts?",gaygeek
"Inspired by the ""first scifi crush"" threads over in /r/scifi, here is MY first scifi crush...*swoon*",,gaygeek
"Tim Cook, the most powerful gay man in America",,gaygeek
Fassbender (Magneto) in drag,,gaygeek
Dave Franco Fucks Himself,,gaygeek
Anyone else excited for the return of Doctor Who this weekend?,,gaygeek
"Yay, 1,000 gay geeks! ","By very broad and liberal definitions of the word 'gay'!

There are moments where i wonder about how to differentiate this subreddit from other that have similar mandates but I'd just like to thank everyone for sticking with it. :)

Thanks for keeping things Geeky. :)

Any suggestions for what people might like to see in the future?",gaygeek
FWP: My GPS told me to go straight,,gaygeek
It's Chemistry,,gaygeek
Daft Punk bodies,,gaygeek
MORE Growed Up,,gaygeek
All growed up,,gaygeek
"Mommy, They Are Just Like Me... [x-post from r/lgbt]",,gaygeek
You got me hard like...,"...adamantium.

...carbonite.

...diamond.

...Battletoads.",gaygeek
Rank #9 isn't bad. :),,gaygeek
"Shia, is that you?",,gaygeek
Curvaceous noir lady found R'lyeh,,gaygeek
just 3 cute guys,,gaygeek
I feel like this belongs here,,gaygeek
"Alejandro, 8-bit",,gaygeek
Ian McKellen playing with himself (SFW),,gaygeek
"OK, I don't think I mind...",,gaygeek
Gay Cliques Census,,gaygeek
Andrew Garfield as Spider-Man,,gaygeek
Sexy Nerd by Jonny McGovern (NSFW),,gaygeek
Pro-Gay Comic Taps 'The Power Within' To Combat Bullying,,gaygeek
Transgender comedian Jeffrey Jay,,gaygeek
Doctor Who Made Me Gay fb group (x-post from r/lgbt),,gaygeek
Mo Rocca comes out,,gaygeek
Nyan Cat Machine Papercraft,,gaygeek
Beefcake Heroes by Joe Phillips,,gaygeek
Death Star To Open Day Care Center,,gaygeek
I want some hot guy android wallpaper. Any suggestions?,"Title says it all, I have an HTC Incredible 2 and I want some hot guy wallpaper for it. Give me your best guys!",gaygeek
A message from Severus Snape,,gaygeek
Classical conditioning,,gaygeek
Congratulations? (NSFW),,gaygeek
Neville Longbottom,,gaygeek
Unleash Your Fingers,,gaygeek
Gordon Brown's apology to Alan Turing,,gaygeek
Super Hard Gay Mario Bros,,gaygeek
Game of Thrones: Queer Scene... (spoilers),,gaygeek
Wolverine X Gambit,,gaygeek
The Force (NSFW),,gaygeek
Business Time (NSFW),,gaygeek
"Cracked.com: 6 Pro-Gay Marriage Arguments for Fighting With Crazy People
",,gaygeek
Gasp! (NSFW),,gaygeek
Gay geeks hangout on Google+,I'm thinking we need to get on Google+ for a hangout. It could be fun. Thoughts?,gaygeek
"Gay Geeks in Love, can they find it eventually?",,gaygeek
Asian Geek [NSFW],,gaygeek
Superman tattoo (NSFW),,gaygeek
oh sweet Jesus,,gaygeek
Geeky But Sexy [NSFW?],,gaygeek
Remembering Alan Turing on his 99th birthday (x-pos from compsci),,gaygeek
Spock inadvertently reveals his true feelings (Xpost from /r/StarTrek),,gaygeek
This just made my day; and yes it is a real thing not some photoshop job :D,,gaygeek
"Werird Al Yankovick's video for ""Perform This Way""",,gaygeek
Hulk bottom (NSFW),,gaygeek
Fagneto,,gaygeek
National Organization for Marriage tagging ads for geeks too?,,gaygeek
Katy Perry - Last Friday Night,,gaygeek
Doctor Nyan,,gaygeek
First Class co-creator: X-Men was gay on purpose,,gaygeek
"Agent Mulder, hitting on a male dwarf",,gaygeek
Does anyone else think the red head in the Newegg commercial is one of the cutest gingers ever?,,gaygeek
Gaga + Magneto: Born This Way,,gaygeek
He-man what's up,,gaygeek
"Oh, hey, THIS just happened in X-Files.",,gaygeek
I really should re-evaluate my opinion of sports... Anyone else a sports geek?,,gaygeek
Honey badger,,gaygeek
X-Men: About a Beast...,,gaygeek
Bat undies (NSFW),,gaygeek
Pretty cute for a federation guy.,,gaygeek
Bradley Cooper en français,,gaygeek
Bat boy,,gaygeek
Photography,,gaygeek
Pond flirting with Pond (Dr. Who),"A Whovian lesbian's favorite dream. 
[Part 1 of the special for context](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=51JtuEa_OPc)",gaygeek
Bat and Boy Wonder,,gaygeek
Girls can be Gay Geeks too.,"Definitely want this subreddit to be inclusive.  

Any suggestion for content for Lesbian and female geeky content would be great.",gaygeek
Vikings,,gaygeek
Gay Nerds (dot) com!,,gaygeek
  Lesbian Geek | Lesbian Gamers - For Gay Girls Who Game,,gaygeek
Base damage?,,gaygeek
Ever watch a show for the wrong reasons?,,gaygeek
Icons,,gaygeek
"250 nautical miles, due east!",,gaygeek
Gay bargaining,,gaygeek
X-Men: First Class Drag Kings Among Us,,gaygeek
"Horray! New Alpha Flight: Ya know, for Canadian Gay comicbook geeks... hullo? Anyone else out there?",,gaygeek
Gambit,,gaygeek
Canton Everett Delaware III: Possibly more badass than Captain Jack (mild Doctor Who spoilers),"Canton Everett [Delaware](http://www.bbc.co.uk/doctorwho/dw/characters/Canton) III, companion to the Doctor in the first two episodes season 6 with strong hints that there will be more.

He is a Nixon era renegade former FBI agent, a suit wearing gun carrying smart-mouthed supreme badass.  And as much as I love me some Captain Jack, I think he's winning as the most compelling gay characters I've ever seen on TV.  On what is technically a *children's* show, maybe the most iconic children's show in history, he's absolutely fucking astounding.

Introduced first as an old man who clearly has had extended interactions with the Doctor, then again as his younger self; the ex-FBI agent in 1969, great as his job but fired for unspecified reasons.  He says it was because he wanted to get married, that his marriage would be a crime, with implications of an interracial relationship though in 1969 this was two years after *Loving vs. Virginia* struck down miscegenation laws.

They save the world, and the Doctor exits Nixon's office while saying that Delaware just wants to get married and maybe Nixon could do something about that.  Nixon asks, ""This person you want to marry, they're black?""  Delaware replies ""Yes Mr. President, he is.""

I was worried when RTD left that Doctor Who would rejoin 99% of the rest of science fiction as a universe where straightness is the universal default and everybody is white.  I underestimated Moffat entirely, and I am so excited to see where he takes this character.",gaygeek
Such talent,,gaygeek
"X-Men: First Class Don't Ask, Don't Tell",,gaygeek
Gray Edwards,,gaygeek
Bionic and cute,,gaygeek
Justin Timberlake + SNL = Awesomesauce,,gaygeek
X-Men: First Class Mystique Spotlight,,gaygeek
X-Men: First Class Banshee Spotlight,,gaygeek
X-Men: First Class Havok Spotlight,,gaygeek
Urban ninjas,,gaygeek
Fabulous transformer explosions,,gaygeek
Gay zombie,,gaygeek
Cognitive dissonance: Republican Aaron Schock,,gaygeek
Body juggler,,gaygeek
Two Mommies,,gaygeek
Crash Override vs Acid Burn,,gaygeek
Catblock with Dave Franco,,gaygeek
Cute guy playing Street Fighter IV with Kinect,,gaygeek
Harder Better Faster Bodies,,gaygeek
Google Chrome: It Gets Better,,gaygeek
Ssssuperheroes,,gaygeek
Nerdy boys kissing,,gaygeek
Supergeek Saturday,,gaygeek
How gay are we talkin'?,,gaygeek
Gay Engineers,,gaygeek
Gay thanks in SMBC AMA,,gaygeek
Chris Evans filming Captain America,,gaygeek
Lady Gaga made me sad today because she rejected Weird Al (Perform This Way),,gaygeek
Chromatic Feline,,gaygeek
Supposed iPhone prototype shows alt folder and multitasking UIs,,gaygeek
"Crosspost from /r/forts, video game night with the boys",,gaygeek
Chris Hardwick in Speedos. Mad VPL,,gaygeek
The New Gay,,gaygeek
Apple COO Tim Cook named Most Powerful Gay,,gaygeek
It Gets Better (Apple Employees),,gaygeek
Jon Stewart + Anderson Cooper = Silver Chimera,,gaygeek
You're So Hot with Chris Mintz-Plasse and Dave Franco,,gaygeek
Math is Gender Neutral,,gaygeek
What Topics would you like to see on /r/GayGeek?,"I have to admit that /r/gaymers is doing a good job of covering a lot of geeky topics but I think there's room for more than one community. Throw me some websites/ideas of content and I'll add it to the list of things that i look for.

Sci-Fi/Fantasy, Comics, board games, video games etc, math, science. 

I've always felt ""Geek"" is really someone who is so passionate about a subject that they probably push the boundaries what is socially acceptable interest. ;)

Cheers,
Majeric",gaygeek
Irish Anti-Homophobia Short [X-Post from LGBT],,gaygeek
Stan Lee answers some pressing questions about what goes on in some superheroes' pants...,,gaygeek
"In ""Dragon Age 2"" continues to have a little something for everyone.",,gaygeek
"Hey! A Comprehensive List of Queer Sci-Fi... Wait, WTF? Aren't those kind of specific...",,gaygeek
Batman and the Riddler,,gaygeek
Hey gaygeek! Thought I'd give a shoutout from r/gaymers! Stay fabulous.,,gaygeek
Star Trek: Enterprise is probably the best series for hot guys.,"S01E19 - Acquisition - the episode with Trip walking about in his underwear.

*Rawr*

Anyone else have any star trek insights? I used to love reading the nifty stories between Paris and Kim.",gaygeek
"The New Superman, Henry Cavill, Shirtless",,gaygeek
"[x-post from r/startrek] I deplored the canon's reason for his existence, but did anyone else think that this Q was a little cute?",,gaygeek
"[x-post from r/comics] In ""The Dark Knight Rises"" 
we'll see Anne Hathaway as Catwoman and Tom 
Hardy as Bane. ...a little bit for everybody.",,gaygeek
Anyone play league of legends?,"Topic, love the game I just have fun no serious business. If you wanna play add me ""kadiev"" tell me on here though so I know who you are. Also I have vent and a mic.",gaygeek
Whoever footballs hardest is the king of football.,,gaygeek
It Gets Better: EA Employees,,gaygeek
"It gets better, TF2",,gaygeek
What flavour of Geek are you?,"Sci Fi, Fantasy, Sports, Video Game (which genre?), Sports Video Game , RPG, Comic Book, Math, Science, Lego etc...

Just Name your top three just to avoid copying and pasting the entire list. :)",gaygeek
"""Outland"", A Gay Australian ""Big Bang Theory""? ",,gaygeek
I agree with Dumbledore (pic xpost from r/funny),,gaygeek
David Blue inexplicably just got hotter!,,gaygeek
Life Partners,,gaygeek
Glee - Teenage Dream,,gaygeek
The 25 Awesomest LGBTQ Comic Book Characters (X Post),,gaygeek
What is your favourite gay geeky thing?  ,"My answer is Buffy, I probably wouldn't be a geek today if it weren't for that show and David Boreneaz is so damn hot ^^ .",gaygeek
Hottest people in geekdom?,"My top 3:

3.[Pete Cashmore](http://www.google.com/imgres?imgurl=http://amyabrahams.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/02/pete-cashmore-mashable.jpg%3Fw%3D300&amp;imgrefurl=http://www.amyabrahams.com/%3Fp%3D30&amp;usg=__Daj5eywUa7jX5jKO22SZKJ2JvZw=&amp;h=280&amp;w=360&amp;sz=32&amp;hl=en&amp;start=0&amp;sig2=c7E0SvhHHiNsE3XF9ryIrw&amp;zoom=1&amp;tbnid=89DAl3DM7LmuMM:&amp;tbnh=140&amp;tbnw=189&amp;ei=aq7dTKSNK4T58Aa34L2MDw&amp;prev=/images%3Fq%3Dpete%2Bcashmore%26hl%3Den%26safe%3Doff%26sa%3DX%26biw%3D705%26bih%3D780%26tbs%3Disch:1%26prmd%3Divnulo&amp;itbs=1&amp;iact=rc&amp;dur=533&amp;oei=aq7dTKSNK4T58Aa34L2MDw&amp;esq=1&amp;page=1&amp;ndsp=12&amp;ved=1t:429,r:4,s:0&amp;tx=88&amp;ty=28).  He might be higher on the list if his jaw didn't appear to be able to cut glass.

2.[Biz Stone](http://www.google.com/imgres?imgurl=http://www.smh.com.au/ffximage/2007/05/22/bizstone_wideweb__470x326,0.jpg&amp;imgrefurl=http://www.smh.com.au/news/web/latest-killer-app-has-us-all-atwitter/2007/05/21/1179601329664.html%3Fs_cid%3Drss_technology&amp;usg=__hwkUx19PdjTXKMzH618OIQ-BdnI=&amp;h=326&amp;w=470&amp;sz=27&amp;hl=en&amp;start=0&amp;sig2=-KH3NHd08GR2AOTlC4p7iQ&amp;zoom=1&amp;tbnid=tfBytqTbkYbzGM:&amp;tbnh=131&amp;tbnw=189&amp;ei=nK7dTLieHoKB8gbHgpiLDw&amp;prev=/images%3Fq%3Dbiz%2Bstone%26hl%3Den%26safe%3Doff%26biw%3D705%26bih%3D780%26tbs%3Disch:1&amp;itbs=1&amp;iact=hc&amp;vpx=320&amp;vpy=133&amp;dur=385&amp;hovh=187&amp;hovw=270&amp;tx=186&amp;ty=112&amp;oei=nK7dTLieHoKB8gbHgpiLDw&amp;esq=1&amp;page=1&amp;ndsp=14&amp;ved=1t:429,r:2,s:0)

1.[Nolan Gerard Funk](http://www.imdb.com/media/rm673219072/nm1289173) I could drool over him all day if I had the time.

Men and Women are separated in the comments.",gaygeek
Homosexuality and Fallout: New Vegas: A gay marriage made in gay Heaven (1 of the pics might be considered NSFW),,gaygeek
"""Guess Who?"" - ""Mr. Sulu?"" - ""Oh You Wish"" Star Trek's Gay Kiss Scene (xpost from LGBT)",,gaygeek
I *might* forgive them if Russell Tovey joins Torchwood (Children of Earth Spoiler),,gaygeek
"Alan Turing: Don't Ask, Don't Tell Poster",,gaygeek
Video Game Offers New Ways To Play As Gay,,gaygeek
One was an Autobot; One was a Decepticon; it was Starcrossed... (PG13 - NSFWish) ,,gaygeek
Oh Sheldon Teases Us So... (SFW),,gaygeek
Trogdor Says...,,gaygeek
Seven Gay Game Couples Who Should Make It Legal - GayGamer.net,,gaygeek
Six Gay Geeks who've improved the pop culture landscape,,gaygeek
"Daniel Radcliffe 'Heartbroken' By Tyler Clementi, Seth Walsh, Other Suicides",,gaygeek
Anyone recommend some good SciFi or Fantasy novels with queer content?,"I've read Mercedes Lackey's Last Herald Mage and Lynn Flewelling's Nightrunner series and I've got some compilations of short stories of Sci-Fi and Fantasy but I'm kind of looking for something new of any reasonable substance.

As a side note, it's interesting how The Last Herald Mage dates itself depending on where you read it in your coming out process (Wether its emotionally impactful or not) and Flewelling's Nightrunner series is  but she really doesn't focus on the relationship anyway which comes across like she's not entirely comfortable with writing about it even though her intentions are noble. 
",gaygeek
Anyone else notice that the gay community really likes Star Trek?,"Maybe it's just me... and I admit that's becoming less relevant given that there isn't a show on the air.

However, I would say that the vast majority of my gay friends and acquaintances *aren't* geeks by definition (and still consider ""geek"" a dirty word) but somehow Star Trek seems to have transcended that particular boundary.

Undoubtedly the show paints an idealized world/culture in which we'd all like to belong where one would hope that same sex relationships are not only accepted but are entirely status quo (though the show never actually presented same-sex relationships as such).

I think its appeal will continue some... if for no other reason than the appeal of Zachary Quinto and Chris Pine . :D (and a reasonably compelling story by J.J. Abrams)",gaygeek
Any advice for meeting other gay/bi geeks?,,gaygeek
What character/actor in a Sci-Fi/Fantasy film made you realize you were gay?,"When I was around 14/15 I was a nerdy, sexually confused teenager.  I felt that there was something different about me, but I couldn't quite understand what it was.  Two movies helped me to pave the way for me accepting that I was gay:

At age 14, I rediscovered the Goonies on VHS, and the film was was revelation.  The nostalgia factor was high, and I noticed something new - I felt strange feelings for the character Mikey (Sean Astin).  Days afterward, I kept thinking about him, so I rented another film that he starred in, White Water Summer.  This was the film that made me practically obsessed with Sean Astin.  I bought a Cutting Crew tape so that I could re-listen to a song prominently featured in the film.  I even bought a NY Yankees hat hat just to be like his character.  Looking back, I realized that I was just horribly attracted to Sean.  He was my first nerdy crush.

My second crush came at age 15, when I watched Star Wars.  I hadn't seen the films since I was in first grade, so re-watching the trilogy felt like the most epic thing I had ever experienced.  I loved it so much that I found myself wanting to live in the galaxy of Star Wars.  The other thing I discovered was that Luke Skywalker was incredibly cute.  I wanted to give him a kiss on his cheek (just like Leia in Ep 4), and I really wanted to watch him parade around with his skimpy shirt in Empire.  

Without any gay characters on TV or in films (that I was aware of at the time), I was forced to look elsewhere for inspiration; anything to make me feel like these feelings were normal.  Fortunately, these films (and characters) somehow helped me to accept that I was gay.  

Anyone care to share their geek-filled moments when they realized that they liked boys/girls?

PS, my gay inspirations:

http://pacejmiller.files.wordpress.com/2010/04/sean-astin.jpg
http://www.empireonline.com/100-greatest-movie-characters/default.asp?c=54",gaygeek
"Gay ""pride"" t-shirt ",,gaygeek
I've heard of chubby chasers.. is there such a thing for nerds?,"Are there guys out there who only look for nerds/geeks?  Or is it the case where most guys like the idea of a hot guy wearing glasses, but that's as far as it goes?

I wonder what a good name would be for guys who chase nerds? 

  ",gaygeek
Gaming with that special guy (gaygamer),,gaygeek
Some love for Alan Turing,,gaygeek
Video gayme characters. ,"Is there a video game moment where you groaned when you realized your character, whom you imagined as gay, was suddenly revealed as hopelessly heterosexual?

 ",gaygeek
For all of my fellow gay gamers,,gaygeek
Scott Pilgrim and the world of indie gay comic books,,gaygeek
Ten gay superheroes who broke new ground,,gaygeek
Reluctant Gay Dude's Guide to Modern Gay Vernacular,,gaygeek
"Louis Virtel being fierce at trivia (Madonna, Batman, and Melrose Place)",,gaygeek
"NIGHTLIFE #5, new digital gay erotic comic you can purchase and download for $2.90",,gaygeek
WATCH: Christopher Rice Teases Spooky New Thriller,,gaygeek
Daniel Radcliffe Offered Second Gay Icon Role In Freddie Mercury Biopic / Queerty,,gaygeek
13 Foods You're Pronouncing Wrong,,gaygeek
This Is What It Looks Like When The King Of The Nerds Gives Your Infant Daughter A Pep Talk,,gaygeek
Comic Noob,So I'm a big nerd/geek but haven't quite gotten into the comic scene yet and really wanted to. What's the best place to start for a beginner? I love superheroes and such but didn't know where to really start with Marvel/DC,gaygeek
Australian Cattle Dog and DILF,,gaygeek
[The Big Bang Theory] Should Raj come out?,"I preface all of this with the fact that Big Bang Theory skirts (read:clubs you over the head with) being offensive when it comes to how it treats geeks as being the butt of jokes vs celebrating geek culture.

One of the not-so-subtle-subtext of the story is this idea that Raj is ""sensitive"" and ""one of the girls"". It's the butt of the jokes but it's never so malicious that I find it horribly offensive (perhaps I have thick skin). Certainly, they make all these gay-subtext jokes with Raj and his relationship with the group (particularly his relationship with Howard and later Stuart)

However, they have done it so much that I'm left wondering if it's more offensive or less offensive if he were *actually* to come out. If Raj came out, it would be playing to all the stereotypes of being gay by the fact that he lived up to them. If Raj remains straight, they miss out on an opportunity to demonstrate that even within a subculture, we have diversity. BBT would do well to have a gay character. 

I mean his character doesn't have to be a 6 on the Kinsey scale... clearly he can be sexual with women. (No amount of alcohol short of being unconscious would get me to have sex with women) but Raj may think that he has to as a result of pressure from his parents. He's a wrapped up bundle of psychological issues.

I doubt it will ever happen. Chuck Lore doesn't strike me as a person who is socially progressive in his story telling. He's out for a cheap laugh most of the time.
",gaygeek
Batgirl - Gay Icon?,,gaygeek
Architecture geeks! A tour around the Shard (London) viewing platform with a very pleasant gentleman,,gaygeek
"So, was just watching Firefly...",,gaygeek
"Republican staffer, Derek Khanna",,gaygeek
Call to arms! Can you please help?,"EDIT: Voting is now live... You can visit the voting page at [voteforEXMO.com](http://voteforEXMO.com), and see my... ahem... Academy Award winning ""acting"". I'm the one in the white/yellow striped shirt. Please use the red 'Vote' button to the right of the video to vote for us.

---

This weekend I attended 'Startup Weekend' in Tampa, in which I joined a team with 5 other people (who had never met before), and we spent 54 hours over the weekend creating a new business from scratch, and ended up with a presentation in front of a judging panel competing against 13 other teams. Our team/business 'EXMO' won!!!

We now move up to the next round (http://globalstartupbattle.org/) competing against 137 other regional winners from around the world. We had 1 day to create a video about our product in order to get into round 2.

This final round consists of the 138 videos being voted for by people like you. Voting opens Wednesday 21st, and I'll be posting a link to our video then. Please can you help by voting for EXMO? Voting will close on the 27th, and you are allowed one vote per day.

I'll post again on Wednesday (at 3PM) with the voting details, but I wanted to give you a heads up now so you may be prepared in advance. I think we have a real shot of winning, and it could be huge!!!

Thanks for reading my wall of text. I'll have another tomorrow.

---

P.S. To further entice you, I even 'acted' on camera in our pitch video. At the very least you should appreciate my bad acting!!

P.P.S. Our facebook page is: http://www.facebook.com/GetEXMO",gaygeek
Armin Ronacher,,gaygeek
Joseph Gordon-Levitt on the Nerdist podcast,,gaygeek
"How to Eat a Cupcake, Like a Gentleman",,gaygeek
Stopped into the HRC offices in Washington DC and learned something surprising about one of their employees.,,gaygeek
Let's talk Batman/The Dark Knight Rises (spoilers),Not going to intentionally reveal any spoilers but just a warning to anyone who reads this thread.,gaygeek
Melodores - ICCA 2011 Wild Card Champions,,gaygeek
"I started watching ""Bones""... I am so disappointed!",,gaygeek
Gay emoji for iOS 6,,gaygeek
"Hey guys, come check out a new sub r/electromo!!","R/electromo is an EDM/electronic music sub put on by me and a couple guys who love men and EDM. This sub is for EVERYONE; gay, straight, male, female, and everything in between! We have daily submissions, soon a mod favorite playlist, and monthly giveaways! This month is a mellow moods Tee!! So come check out the sub, Hope to see y'all over there!!!

http://www.reddit.com/r/electromo/ ",gaygeek
[X-post r/anime] Gay? Like anime... come check this out!,"Probing interest for a homo-sexual friendly anime based sub-reddit, only for the true nerdy haha .___. Just kidding... [Comment and come up with a snazy name for the sub reddit here](http://www.reddit.com/r/anime/comments/s0137/are_there_any_homosexual_gay_anime_groups_or/)

If your interested go ahead and check out the thread over here in r/anime and if theres enough interest I'll start it up Thanks for reading!",gaygeek
Favourite LGBT character? ,So what is everyone's favourite LGBT?  Currently mine is Thom Creed from the novel Hero by Perry Moore.,gaygeek
Any of you like .Net?,I am looking for a co-founder for a project I am working on and I haven't had any hits yet.  I am also hit up all my dev friends and they are too busy.  If you think you might like to join a project let me know.,gaygeek
The horny-ness graph...,"Sorry, not equipped with any visual aids. Maybe a mathematician out there can plot this out for me?

So I liken horny-ness to be like a value on a graph... That has a periodic drop off (pleasure, self-induced or otherwise)... And I was thinking about its rate of growth... (LOL, growth)

Is there an upper limit to the value of horny-ness, so it's logarithmic or is it more asymptotic?

If it was asymptotic, does that mean someone can be ""infinitely horny"" given enough days of denial?",gaygeek
Chemist and I Know It,,gaygeek
"Magic: The Gathering - Mmm, Brandon",,gaygeek
"Cute guys, cute home",,gaygeek
Pickup Line Scientist  has to put his electrons somewhere,,gaygeek
"New subreddit! /r/happentobegay, because there's more to us than our orientation",,gaygeek
Lesbians and Disney references,,gaygeek
Fuck Yeah Sassy Gay Nerd,,gaygeek
Any good online free yaoi comics/sites?,"Gotten into yaoi lately, and I was hoping one of you wonderful fellows might be able to help feed my new obsession? ",gaygeek
Kids these days... [SMBC],,gaygeek
"All day, every day for men [SMBC]",,gaygeek
IAmA bromances,,gaygeek
Gay Geeky Interests: The Science of Sexual Orientation,,gaygeek
Sex toys meet science fiction? (NSFW),,gaygeek
Spider-Man: Edge of Time Ultimate costume,,gaygeek
Noodles and Beef,,gaygeek
Blow,,gaygeek
There is a new sub-reddit catering to the LGBT community in the NYC area. All are welcome.,,gaygeek
Superman x Batman (NSFW),,gaygeek
help a homo out?,"I know nothing about comics. 
But I watched X-Men: First Class and my interest was piqued. I guess you could call me curious.

Can I get some pointers/tips for a budding gay comic geek? I'm already super geeky about the interwebz (memes, etc), I'm also a gent. I'm pretty sure I can't get into video games, but I want to give this comics thing a go. It'll solidify my gay geek/nerd status!

So, what should I do/read/buy?

NOTE: I go to a big university with a huge library (fifth largest in the US, whatwhat), so if there are books/graphic novels you think I should checkout, lemme know!

Another NOTE: I was really into the queer identity/rights undertone of First Class, so anything that taps into that would be greatly appreciated.",gaygeek
Mal Reynolds riding the equivalent of a mechanical bull? I didn't know T Fury was doing softcore porn these days...,,gaygeek
"Hey, is there any way to set 'it' so that youtube automatically goes for the 480p option?","Hi there, first post, well, no, first reddit? and here I am trying to suckle on your collective wisdom like some sorta leech or whatever.
So yeah, i'm asking my fellow gaymers, i assume, but in the gaygeek category, you know, cos its more of a technical thing... is it bad that i assume there is some sorta crazy link goin on there? 
But, you know when you load a video on youtube, and its cool, in 360p, so you maximise it, then the whole thing has to start buffering again as it reverts to 480p.. 
So, I was wondering if anybody knows a way how I can get it sorted so it automatically selects 480 from the get go, so my demand for instant gratification is met!
I'll offer a premature, if enthusiastic (as in so many other things, how very droll) cheers! and also, you look wonderful today, no, you really do! its true!",gaygeek
Batwoman to be included among the titles for the #1 DC reboot,,gaygeek
"Comedian, podcaster, Dave Rubin",,gaygeek
Blue Elephant + Lasers,,gaygeek
Green Lantern trailer,,gaygeek
X-Men: First Class - Trailer,,gaygeek
Joel Spolsky AMA,,gaygeek
Robotech(Macross): Addressing Agression in an All-Male Military,,gaygeek
"Casey Schreiner: geek, gamer, and one of us?",,gaygeek
"Skins, Shameless, and Being Human. Brit Shows gone American.",,gaygeek
Anyone else hit up the Steam sale?,"I'm a casual gamer with a life that doesn't give me time to play super time-consuming games and a computer that can't run them anyway, so a lot of the bigname stuff I didn't pick up, but I probably snagged half of the $5 indie packs, as they were absolute steals.

Anyone else get anything good?",gaygeek
X-Post from Sci-Fi:  Benny Hinn - Dark Lord of the Sith ,,gaygeek
iOS 5 magic,,gaygeek
The Crazy Nastyass Honey Badger,,gaygeek
All grown up IRL,,gaygeek
Changed my SSID...,Just so my horrible mother can't mooch of mine and my grandmas internet anymore.,gaygeek
Sci-fashion,,gaygeek
Hey there fellow homo's,"Ever wanted to play EVE Online? Not to sure if you wanted to buy that account after only 14 days? Message me and i'll get ya a 21 day trial! That's right, an extra week! I've got 6 invites left. I'll even give you 1 Million ISK (in-game monies), to help you get started. Once you're in, do what you want, no obligations though if you don't know about r/gaymers, give it a look, fun group of relaxed people. We do have our own EVE Corp if you're interested.",gaygeek
"Power and Beer, cute GE engineer",,gaygeek
"Alan Turing at 14.5: ""He seems cheerful, though I’m not always certain he really is so."" - House Report",,gaygeek
"Anybody else thinks this guy is drop dead gorgeous? 
 ",,gaygeek
Star Wars - Call Me Maybe,"This song drives me nuts, but at least now there is some Star Wars involved....",gaygeek
OMG!Ubuntu d0od... one of us? o.O,,gaygeek
Apple Special Event October 2012,,gaygeek
"Reddit, My ex doesn't feel that he's ""adorable"" despite me telling him that he is. Can we prove him wrong?",,gaygeek
"Apple SVP, Craig Federighi",,gaygeek
